I want to write a book like this song, I thought.
Challenge 10 - Sentiment as Focal Point
This is a nice little plugin, that does quite a lot of funky things in grails scripts, including managing its own dependencies via Ivy.
I have missed creating with glass so much, and I am getting very excited about getting back to my beloved hobby of glass fusing!
The provisions of Revised Circular No. 28-91 have been adopted and incorporated in Rules 42, 43, 45, 46, 47, 64 and 65.
There are always times where a particular child would come up to you, stick to you or give you a hug, and you’ll never really understand why this child likes you in particular, out of many other mentors.
You’re a precious and perfect unique design,
Have a great Friday. I'll try to, as well.
From the darkest shadows of Gotham Stables, it's Silverbat and his trusty sidekick My Little Pony! Join them on their many confusing, girly adventures as they confound criminals and Butch Cavendish alike. Look in the sky: The Bat/Horse signal pierces the night! The Kaped Crusader and Palomino Wonder are off to the rescue!
So, we got on the road and headed for Muncho Lake Provincial Park, where we hoped to get a campsite at one of the Provincial campgrounds. About an hour outside of Watson Lake, we entered into a huge area that was filled with heavy smoke from the Stewart-Cassiar Highway fire. This fire had been burning for several days and was preventing travel to and from Stewart (and Hyder). Some of our friends from the Caravan group were trying to go back to Hyder but had to wait for this fire to get under control. Anyway, we drove in this heavy smoke for at least 100 miles, way beyond Watson Lake.
Golez: Ate Guy gawing national artist
Mar 12, 2012: Irish Energy Companies Sign Energy Savings Deal With SEAI 17
Political life in Denmark is orderly and democratic. Political changes occur gradually through a process of consensus, and political methods and attitudes are generally moderate. Growing numbers of immigrants and refugees throughout the 1990s, led to over a decade of growing support for anti-immigrant and already-tight immigration laws, the latest revision taking effect August 10, 2009. However, the left-of-center government that took office October 3, 2011 has indicated it will seek to ease immigration requirements. Sounds like what happened here when Obama and Holder took power.
Classic Bride: How did you first get started in photography and when did you know it was a passion?
Carl
Among the items recovered in the building were bomb making materials, chemicals and powdery substances, one AK 47 Assault rifle, 36 knives, six high calibre remote control Improvised Explosive Device (IEDs), 35 low calibre remote control IEDs, 458 rounds of ammunition, batteries, bomb timers, among others.
next film ‘Mumbai Mirror’.
The deal represents the single largest acquisition (fiscally) that Microsoft has ever completed, although it still pales in comparison to the reported $44 billion that they offered for Yahoo! some years ago. While $8.5 billion may seem like a significant figure for a company this isn’t making a profit (more on that in a moment), an article in the Wall Street Journal has suggested that Microsoft would have had to shell out much more if Skype hadn’t been based in Luxemburg with its lower tax. In essence, Microsoft saved themselves a fortune by completing the deal outside of the US. For one thing they didn’t need to repatriate the money from its holdings outside of the US and lose 35% in the process.
“Amazon is a bully,” he said, his voice rising, his cheeks flushing. “Anyone who gets that powerful can push people around, and Amazon pushes people around. They do not exercise their power responsibly.”
I'm already counting down the days to next year's Blood on the Beach Con.
Coleen Garcia
Maybe I should switch to a roll-on.
It breaks my heart to know that he doesn’t feel special. So I told him a story about the first little baby that was in my belly, and how much I love him and how special he was from the very first moment I held him.
I know this is a load at once, but hey, that's what Amazon vouchers are for, right? :) I'm bound to be reviewing at least some of these over the next few months.
Stockly was the last Westerner living in Timbuktu and refused to leave after the legendary desert city fell to the Islamist Ansar Dine rebels on April 1.
This means restarting the relationship on new and different terms.
The Temasek Times’ exclusive coverage of the Sun Xu saga has also been well received in Hong Kong with many Hong Kong netizens expressing their ‘solidarity’ with Singaporeans.
“And such Divine Persons can ‘feed’ with their Own Strength a lot of aspiring people at the same time!
dark plunge—
Would a vengeful Drona have gone to teach the Kuru grandchildren if Drupada had respected him?
My goal is to get through this eating holiday with no weight gained!!!
In my experience the majority of sentence mangling occurs when writers aren’t sure about what they are doing. I teach from time to time and come across quite a lot of mangling one way or another. Sometimes a student might write a fight scene but hasn’t visualised it properly so tries to describe several actions in the one sentence or a writer might want to explain some element of a character’s personality but aren’t entirely sure of what they want to say. Sometimes mangling occurs when someone wants to appear more erudite than their knowledge actually justifies, or when they have been told that they shouldn’t repeat the same word too often and raid the thesaurus for synonyms... always risky. Mangled sentences tend to accompany mangled thinking or maybe, for those of us who only think when we’re writing, mangled writing produces mangled thinking.
Social networking sites like Facebook: 5
A decision that totally undid me and broke me.
You will blaze through life a flaming sun,
President Obama graduated with his J.D. in 1991 (thanks, Wikipedia). That’s twenty-one years ago. He says that he finished paying off his loans eight years ago. That means our President, who spent 7 years as a State Senator and 3 as a US Senator (and I think we can all agree those are not minimum-wage type jobs), took THIRTEEN YEARS to pay off his student loans.
I received a lesson in the poaching of interviews, courtesy of the band’s frontman – that’s what happened! The frontman had taken the interview out of my hands – and steered it into the direction he wanted it to go. By being the sole participant to the interview, he answered the questions with neatly tied up close ended answers, allowing no spin off question, or an unwanted digging into the band psyche and line of thought. He put me in front of a bolted down big red door, with no way of getting a peep inside.
I chose a $14 St. Agur Szechuan Pepper Chicken Salad from the lunch menu. The salad was unexceptional. The Szechuan dressing was barely perceptible. They weren't very generous with the blue cheese either. Plenty of chicken though, albeit a little on the dry side.
The 26th annual Pennwriters conference is on its way and planning has already started! With YOUR help we can make this conference great. Interested in volunteering? Contact Jessica Williams, 2013 Conference Coordinator at JessWilliams06@Verizon.net.
No surprises here though, Kahaani belongs to Vidya Balan who brings her namesake to life with a superlative performance, easily meeting the demands of the role with an effortlessness that is compelling and entertaining to watch. Whether it is the vulnerable woman overwhelmed by the circumstances thrown at her or the determination to find her husband or indeed handling the curveball thrown at the end, Vidya does it all with aplomb and still has time to coax good performances from the child actors. This really is a perfect follow up to The Dirty Picture and shows Vidya to be a versatile actress who clearly has bags of potential to be showcased and needs to be challenged beyond regular Hindi cinema fare with tailor made roles; not only to push the boundaries put upon Hindi film actresses but to also add to what is already becoming a formidable body of work as an actor.
They close at 3 PM.
I love that I found it at a thrift store for $2.99.
Me: Oh, and I also made this cheerful little apron for the Whitman County Library Reading Bear! Isn't she a pretty bear? Making the apron was lots of fun! I sort of had to come up with my own pattern -- so I guess that de-addled my brain a little.
This was a follow up to last years two day Cognitive Edge and storytelling based training workshop. This time we worked through a practical example of message mapping, looked at TRIZ with the particular emphasis on business metaphor and a practical demonstration of the Argenta three diamond approach to problem solving. I have just recently joined Argenta as an associate so this was a good opportunity to fully familiarise myself with the use of methods outside a more engineering perspective.
– The Dark Side Of The Moon, Alan Parsons Quad Mix (previously released only on vinyl LP/8 track tape in 1973) in standard resolution audio at 448 kbps
No, not at all. Not only do the 'Palestinians' want a judenrein apartheid state of their own, they refuse to recognize Israel as a Jewish state and insist on the right to swamp Israel with violent 'refugees'.
The hubby and I lived in a tent while we built our house. It is actually more of a cottage than a house. It is 24 foot square. There is an upstairs with two rooms of slightly less than 12 x 24 useable space. That is where I try to maintain most of my craft supplies. Of course, it has spilled over into every room of this little house!! When my dad learned about us living in a tent while we built our place (I kept it from him till we had the house almost completely built cause I thought he would worry) he was so excited about it---he thought it was fantastic that I was willing to live in a tent while we built and he loved that we used recycled materials as much as possible.
In it, she generalizes an entire subset of people, trying to scare them. I’m not sure which is worse, that she generalized an entire subset of people, trying to scare them, or that she did so on purpose. She lists off a bunch of random prices for things that aren’t accurate. She doesn’t take into account living costs in certain areas, independence and maturity levels of certain teens, love, affection and support of certain families…the list goes on. My least favorite part is that she assures the teen mom that other people will find her pregnant belly disgusting. None of these things are inherently true. All of them, though, hold some intrinsic value, and her intentions, as ill-applied as they were, are good. As are mine.
Vega uses a blend of pea, pea, rice, alfalfa, and SaviSeed (sacha inchi) which contains tryptophan. It also contains a branch chain ammino acide (BCAA) complex, L-Glutamine, and some digestive enzymes. One serving has 120 calories and 26g of protein, which I thought was pretty high for a powder.
- Fresh pork loin centre cut chops boneless $4.99/lb ($11.00/kg)
And of course, if you are in the middle of a poker hand, it suddenly becomes much more difficult to respond to a phone call, or a dog/cat altercation, or the piles of dishes that seem to never be clean.
It has the appearance more of a bar/restaurant, entry that day was difficult due to the two staff smoking and blocking the door, peering through the window I couldn't see any hand pumps. Next time I'll venture in but that day I had plenty of others to choose from.
Self examination can be a painful process. Looking through the lens of truth can be ugly. Many don’t like to even enter into this process, but it is a critical piece if we desire growth. As I was engulfed in my reflection something strange happened, I realized that I had primarily regarded my baby as an infant. Suddenly, I understood how far away I was from that time in my life and only then realized that my child would have entered their teen years. I began to wander down a mental path of a life extinguished before it began and all the “what ifs” that came along with it! I sincerely understand that I am forgiven but just as it is with many other sins, there are consequences on earth.
Until next time (After the Dunmow Duathlon) – Stay safe – stay seen!!!
2. I used a Wilton Food Writer pen to draw the face on a hard boiled egg. These pens are great for making fun food, and they come in different colors. If you do not want to purchase a food safe marker, dip a q-tip in food coloring to draw the face on your eggshell.
Donna Hole
To think that when i started taxi driving a gallon of fuel was about £2.80 and that was only 6 -7 years ago.
Bo could still clear a room.
Father: "Well, Son. I have something to discuss with you."
Nice opener, crowd definitely got into it after they got back to the ring from the back.
In some situations, a product is released into a market where people are visibly frustrated and impatient that an important task they have is not getting satisfied. When the product clearly addresses this high-awareness task, it’s a success from the beginning. In such a situation, word of mouth strategies are very effective.
So what am I saying to me and to you with this particular bit of stream of consiousness blogging? Perhaps only this: write and have fun and worry about the rest later.
Bake, rotating pans halfway through, until the cupcakes are golden brown, 20 to 25 minutes.
total area of my garden= 150 square feet/ 15 metres square
secluded islands full of sunshine and nature???
When listening to the podcast you will also notice when Karl says something vaguely humorous or outrageous - Ricky will do a very over-the-top laugh. This might even be something you would have noticed if you've heard the guys on the radio before or seen them on TV. What Karl says is usually funny anyway, but Ricky's laughter subconsciously makes you want to laugh out loud too (take this from someone who was listening to this podcast on a coach to London, desperately trying to suppress laughter to avoid looking weird to other passengers).
It hasn't been so good here lately. Making it, but barely. Which will come first? The 80% mortality rate acute infection? The end all autoimmune complication? Being laid-off again?
Feb: "To the hardware store."
As you know, I volunteer for the vintage fashion show in my town somewhere in Somerset (England) Vintage Fashion Show and I have been hoping to share these pictures with you all. the last time I was at the fashion show, all we had was vinatge and ethicall garments.
some random photos taken on a day out to Domme and my harvest so far I have grown some delicious melons don't quite know how I have managed it.
If you’ve never ever tried a stuffed pizza, Bacino’s is a fantastic location to begin. Dan Bacin, the owner, is committed to fresh ingredients, so his pies are more healthy than most. There’s a excellent assortment of draught and bottle beers to accompany your meal too.
Last year, the Navy asked the War Gaming Department of the U.S. Naval War College to find out what the Navy needs for sustained operations in the Arctic.
She said it will take her a few days to compile the information (understandable) and that it would be a rather large packet (fine with me). Funny, she told me that there were some payments made with a Visa card and that they provided a checking account that the thief claimed to be in my name. Great. Fucking great. If it is, in fact, in my name, then this asshole has a bank account opened in my name too.
Everyone in school boasted about smoking weed. No-one ever mentioned it could drive you mad, make you walk naked down the motorway out of your mind, like Jay. She noticed more and more stuff about drugs on the telly since she’d been at the Greenhouse. There were hundreds of secret cannabis farms, just like Colin’s, all over the country. She had no idea. The police had raided two farms in Portsmouth just last week. Would they find out about the Greenhouse?
That's right folks,
There must be something he would just oh-so hate to happen that he is compelled to stop it, some idea so against his ingrained world-view that he would hate to see it advance, something so completely bad that he MUST complete his NYR and do good things (good things? E@L don't need no stinking good things!) instead. (Reversely or forwardly.)
Marvin had to investigate...He has recently decided that if I'm doing something, he should be sitting in the middle of it. It's very difficult to turn pages in books with a catbutt in the way...If I have a quilt block in the hoop, he feels the need to curl up on it if I set it down somewhere.
Digital Short: Helen Mirren’s Magical Bosom
Night owl!
On a final note, the scene where Korra is over taken by Amon and his lackeys was great. The animation: superb. The way they utilized the darkness, being illuminated by only Korra’s fire bending was exiting, and added to the frightening atmosphere. Plus the glowing of the chi-blockers green goggles added an animalistic quality to them that fit perfectly with their movements and the atmosphere. That scene really got my heart pounding.
“If we really want to prevent abuse later in life we need to start that at middle school,” said Miller.
To the beating of djembes executed “live” by five
And on the horizon rest at last
He talked to her for 2-3 mins and as he was going to ask her mobile number….
Almost everyone think Kidd deserves the championship title he finally clinched after failing in two Finals with New Jersey Nets before. But the same universe never conspire with James after two Finals defeat. Maybe the remained-ringless King should join Sacramento Kings to earn his ring. Pardon me for being irrational like this, but hey, at least it rhymes!
This is the very first post I ever wrote for a blog - written in July 2008 a could of months before SPIDER came out.
10 Shake It And Break It
It should be the natural thing today for one, who is in trouble to seek out a pastor, a Bible teacher, or a Christian, knowing that only God has the answer to the problems of man, as He did for the runaway slave.
But somehow somewhere you got mixed up into thinking it’s all about a lucky break…
Indian Institute of Technology,
At first, I said, "Well, I liked the movie and I can absolutely see how it could make a difference in a couple's marriage, but that's not the case here." Well, it's been a few weeks since we saw it and I've since changed my mind. I think it actually did make a difference in Joe. Little by little, I've seen some changes in him. Will they last? Is he really changing things now? And is it too late anyway? Only time will tell, but there's definitely something good working in him.
The tongue lapped at my pussy with long, slow, deliberate strokes. The hands were still caressing my boobs. Someone was rubbing some scented skin crème into them.
At the beginning of this project, I committed to search my NIV translation for all of the verses that I could find about worry.
But worse than that; there would be no more Godly influence, no one to hinder the work of Satan. In 2 Thessalonians 2:7, “The mystery of iniquity doth already work: only he who now letteth will let, until he be taken out of the way.” That word “let” is from the Greek KATECHON meaning to hinder, restrain, or hold back. It is used in Galatians 5:7, “Who did hinder you.” The Spirit led body of Christ is to be hindering the work of Satan and when the church is taken out of the way, the Devil will proceed, unrestrained into the great Tribulation.
-Place the dumplings in a steamer, cover and steam for 7-10 minutes.
Oh the complaining. Oh the whining.
I only drool in my sleep. I’m a tad too erudite and educated to be considered a slack-jawed cretin.
His face the moment I proposed.
Not what I wanted to hear. I tried to explain to Helen, keeping in mind that she's five, and this is the end of a long, hot day involving a trip to the public pool and the ball fields and the playground and no nap, that the butterflies aren't bad because they're black and red. These are just the colors the artist chose. Any color butterfly can be bad.
You already know I can't talk about the animals without mentioning Stella, the Mustang Princess, ever watchful, giving us the love whinny whenever our kitchen door creaks on its hinges, day or night. She and I are at that stage now, the one I've patiently waited to arrive. That stage would be the one Pangolin suggested we go for when the moment was right. We put our heads together trading breaths. Thanks Pangolin. A beautiful and holy experience for which there are no words in our language to describe. A final word on the holiday, perhaps one of the loveliest, indoors, ceiling fans blowing off the outside world of chemtrails and Big Ag's smog snaking through the passes, the dogs were served vanilla ice cream and ice cubes in the water bowl. Some might say what a dull holiday nina, I would say Hey, that's my idea of the good life well lived.
One definition given by designer Richard Seymour is ‘making things better for people‘. It emphasises that design activity is focused first on human behaviour and quality of life, not factors like distributor preferences. But nurses or road sweepers could say they, too, ‘make things better for people‘. There may be no absolute definitions of design that will please everyone.
ground on certain issues which will be to their advantage. Thereby leading to the springing up of other terrorist groups causing mayhem and placing demands, is it all of them the government would start to dialogue with? The Boko Haram issue is very different from the N’Delta militants
As the war dragged on, the widowed Mary E. Carroll Knight was left to raise their four children :
I have the lucky chance to review 2 onesies for my kiddos, and I must say I was super impressed with the way they fit. Alot of baby clothes are not try to fit and it makes the garmet look bad, but My Lucys Loft's onesies are made from 100% cotton and they don't shrink up after you use them. They actual design does not fade with, which is a great plus! The shirts/onesies run from size newborn to 10/12 in child's sizes. Like I mentioned before there are alot of options for designs ranging from retro sayings to products for twins!
However, unfortunately, there was also something that made my blood pressure shoot up so high I'm surprised it didn't come spurting out of my ears - and that was Greg Koch and Matt Allyn's The Brewer's Apprentice.
Jan Crawford of CBS reports that a three-member panel of the 5th Circuit Court of Appeals has ordered the U.S. Department of Justice to "answer by Thursday whether the Obama Administration believes that the courts have the right to strike down a federal law."
Bay leaves - 2
Mickey was cut at 2.75" and the tag was cut at 5".
Lyrical theme(s): Satanism, Death, Darkness
Well..this is about to change! We are working on combining both of our blogs into ONE and are excited about new features and information we will be able to offer when we finish this process. As of now this blog has been focused on food storage and our Deals to Meals blog has been focused on cooking tips, meal planning, and recipes. Both of these themes go so well together, I think the combination will only be beneficial and a good move all around.
And I will never complain about paying two euros for a three-bite snack again.
Well I promise I will try and keep up with this Blog malarky. I still have to show you the other layouts in my daughters 21st Album.
You can see the new fronds trying to peak through the old leaves:
Before that, they found a Mafioso by the name of Vincenzo Mazzamaro who had a gun and a sophisticated lock-picking device, and was trying to get into his place.
And when it does, there comes this frequency that only exists here, in the dark, at the bottom, in the bitter solitude. Like wires of music that roll and tangle and rumble with the jet stream, if your senses are clean, you can dip your head back into it and let it pass through, let it fill your ears, ignite your imagination. It can petrify the rotted wood of your wounds and make you strong as stone. It can reverse the very polarity of your heart. It is the most unremarkable kind of magic, and no one ever told you it existed.
That Saturday Trey's celebrated with his friends from school at a local bowling alley. This was by far the easiest party we've ever thrown (the house was a cluttered mess and all I had to do was show up at the bowling alley with a cake and some favors and no cleaning at all!).
Wiseman wanted to discover the best way to ensure that a lost wallet was returned. What would be the best thing to put inside it? He bought 240 wallets and "filled them with the same set of everyday items, including raffle tickets, discount vouchers and fake membership cards."
Please check out my story about her in the Leisure & Arts page of today’s Wall Street Journal.
I'm not going to give you a step by step, but if you have questions, I'll be happy to share anything with you. Just leave your questions in the comments section or email me privately at thefunkiejunkie@gmail.com.
Thanks for sending along Susan Beth Pfeffer's novel, The Year Without Michael. It's a wonderful book on an important topic. Her style--- that staccato prose and crackling dialogue--- is mesmerizing. I read it in one sitting. Pfeffer breaks your heart but she somehow manages to put it together again although the edges remain jagged. A beautiful job.
Just what is the Grassy Knoll Institutes Lost theory….Said in my best John Wayne voice: Now wait a minute pilgrim…
Ms.Johari skillfully, presents the amendments from the perspective of women. She presents stories of women who would be benefited from this bill if it becomes the law. She presented a working woman’s story wherein the woman’s lawyer Meenakshi Lekhi apparently said that, the court rejected her client’s petition for alimony because she is working and could support herself. Now this woman wants a piece of matrimonial property that she allegedly contributed to. She may get it too if this bill turns into law. But, why didnt Ms. Johari ask this woman or her lawyer Ms. Lekhi, as to why, even when the woman is working and could support herself, wanted alimony? The legislative amendments such as CrPC 125, and HMA24 are provided not for personal enrichment but to escape destitution and they are definitely not meant for penalizing the husband. Ms.Johari, if she feels strongly about empowerment and independence, should have questioned the motive of this woman interviewee. But she didn’t.
Silicone Controversies
I had a great week. It's been a lot of family time and relaxing. Then the past two days, it's been a clean up frenzy. I'm not done with all my chores yet, but I needed to do something fun. So, I made some yummies that I'll blog about later, and I made my kids a fun and easy lunch.
soaked in sour wine
But was this self-rule or independence intended to be limited to independence from foreign occupation? The writers of our Constitution, from Ambedkar on, most assuredly did not think so. It was to be independence from tyranny of all kinds, including tyranny of thought and expression and belief, the tyranny of those who think one should not speak one’s mind. These and other aspirations are embodied in the Preamble, the words that precede the actual Articles of law.
Today I run into a curious issue while implementing payment processing via authorize.net on a website. The issue has nothing to do with the website or authorize.net, but rather with php.
If it wasn't for Snack, I would have just turned around and left. But I couldn't just abandon him like a puppy on the side of the highway so I stayed.
Take your time today to Warm Up completely and thoroughly. Listen to your body and pay keen attention to anything that feels out of sorts.
Excellent new single which you can download here by giving an email address. The video is pretty awesome, too, and you can watch it at the end of this post. Sample lyric: "Like the shotgun needs an outcome, I'm your prostitute, you gon' get some!!!" Wow!
They sat down on a rock. He wasted no time on sweet nothings.
6. yt let me sleep in on Wednesday instead of waking me up for my workout.
Today I wore a dress I have had since 1987.
be this way?
Don Madden works with clay. He was not an artist all his life.. coming from the corporate world so he is now busy working with new techniques and creating unique wonderful pieces. He also has a very funny sense of humor which you will find at his blog here.
So there we go...this card is going to a little boy in hospital....his brother is a friend of my G/son..and the wee fellow will be spending his B/day in hospital, so made the card for his brother to give to him...
A lot of women receive a tee shirt for any fraction.
JO: Less concerned about the tat shops and more about the boozing – a little too much in Edinburgh.
Lots of beautiful orchids .
. . . listening to you?
in milk. Cook over medium heat until thickened. Stir
Hehe...
Continue to focus on your breathing
Suddenly, God intervened! In the blink of an eye, life as I knew it ceased and Mandy was suddenly born anew…..thrust into a world I was not prepared for. No one expects illness to cause paralysis. No one expects to fall breaking bones so severely that surgery and a month-long hospitalization and rehab stay becomes necessary! No one expects to find themselves with wheels replacing legs! No one…. no HUMAN…. knew any of this would happen……… except for one! And He is, most assuredly, not human! The one that directed this calamity to befall me was GOD!
To believe in yourself.
Finding myself with a few minutes to kill yesterday morning I quickly down loaded several songs from MP3 Suites, slapped them on my little device and hit the door for work.
“Mom, you can have the bag. I’m all done.”
Shields
Included in the park was land beside the Regent’s Canal known as Bonner’s Fields, after Bishop Bonner of Bethnal Green, whose manor house had stood there (it was demolished in 1800) . The grounds had been a place where heretics were burned at the stake and in 1848 they were the scene of Chartist riots. The police turned out in force to quell the riot but this fortunately ended peacefully when the crowd was dispersed by a thunderstorm!
If you think your relationship is unhealthy, it’s important to think about your safety now. Consider these points as you move forward:
Me: Nothin, huh? I didn't say anything *Nostrils flare, clench hands, Lamaze breathing.
Mark especially liked Vermont, D.C., North Carolina, Tennessee, Louisiana, Monument Valley in Arizona, Portland in Oregon and Victoria on Vancouver Island (but he liked lots of other places too).
My youngest is in kindergarten; six years old going on 26 (he thinks, and always has, I assume because of his older siblings.) Needless to say, with his siblings all quite a bit older than him , he knows the latest dance moves of high school and college students as well as the words to the most current, hip music but as such, he has never been that into toys; mostly he just tears all of them out of his closet into a mess on the floor and then leaves to go play outside!
This time I tried yet another type of pen in my stash--The Souffle Pens. I LOVE these pens and use them all the time in my Art Journals. I thought what the heck--let's try. If you have never used this type of pen i'd have to say it is more like a paint pen. It goes on very clear and changes to a chalky look after dry. If you look up close in the picture you can see that the letter's are not perfect. This IS NOT due to the pen holder--it is the type of ink and the way it comes out of the pen, which I happen to LOVE!
Perhaps one day,family losses will be a factor into your monitoring during your own pregnancy. Maybe it will help to boost your check-ins or ultrasounds or even just your betas.
Also, you need your own email for your writing business.
"It is easy to see the faults of others, but difficult to see one’s own faults. One shows the faults of others like chaff winnowed in the wind, but one conceals one’s own faults as a cunning gambler conceals his dice."
Friday: Happy Hour with free appetizers 4:30 - 5:30, special tbd
She had no luck with love too. A young dude beat her up; a married man took her money; and a failed businessman killed himself.
from one mother to another...lol! I was blessed by a friend who got me the SU die for this purse. It is so cute and you can make two of these on a 12" x 12" DP. I got my paper from Ben Franklin. It's double sided too, so when you open it's pretty inside :) I'm sorry I didn't take a picture of what it looks like when it's opened. It's a really small purse, but it could hold a couple pieces of candy. Here's what one looks like...
Add vanilla extract and icing sugar and blend on a low speed until combined. Increase to medium speed and beat until it begins to get fluffy.
hth.
Guidelines on what to look for in a Rechargeable AA and AAA Batteries and Battery Chargers. Learn about AA and AAA batteries, chemistry, and how battery chargers operate.
DILCIA OSORTO, Appellant, v. DEUTSCHE BANK NATIONAL TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee for Natixis 2007-HE2, Appellee. 4th District. Case No. 4D10-3631. March 28, 2012.
Originally posted July 19, 2009
Now Suta becomes fully satisfied that his audience is fit to truly relish a full disclosure of Srimad Bhagavatam – the poetry describing the character and deeds of many incarnations of the Supreme Entity, the subject matter that should be meditated upon to attain the highest blessing. But he wonders, “Previously they mentioned Krishna as the son of Vasudeva and Devaki as their prime interest, but later they extended their interest to all incarnations of the Supreme Godhead. Which incarnation of Godhead should I really focus on as I narrate these divine tales?”
Last Saturday my sister-in-law (well almost) had a 'Spanish night'. She and her husband provided lots of tapas, sangria, olives and home-made spanish fare :) So my mother-in-law provided a trifle (not very spanish but no-one would complain, her trifles are amazing!) and I provided a desert with the Spanish element, a very aptly named 'Spanish cake'.
Sex: M
In both films, Arnold attacks three individuals at the beginning; the three punks in The Terminator and three at the bar in Terminator 2 (the man he takes clothes from, the man who attacks him with a pool stick and the man who stabs him).
Justice without mercy is legalism. Mercy without justice is license. Only when we realize the need for justice tempered with mercy do we have a fair and equitable result.
If I lose awareness
So I have discovered that for me, writing about a place is one of the ways I can interact with it - it's more engaged and intimate than just taking a walk or taking a few pictures (although wouldn't be, I expect, for a real photographer). And writing about a very familiar place makes it into something new and strange - just as whenever I try and write autobiographical pieces, factions, personal essays, whatever, they come out story-shaped and frilled with lies.
April looks pretty uneventful as I didn’t post many notes in my daytimer. I know for a fact it wasn’t uneventful as I had many fires on the go, was still struggling with Firestone Head Office, was having the boat to sell and dealing with many brokers, had many paperwork tasks to do related with Rob’s passing, etc. I did not at this time know anything about Law of Attraction or any other self development knowledge, but looking back now … I wonder just how much I had to do with what was showing up in my life?
4,448 Square Feet
*I'd use the Van's gluten free, whole wheat waffles for this one! It will cut the cooking time to nearly seconds- just toast 'em and start stacking your sandwich!
Second, remember who you are and why you’re writing this book. What is your book about? What purpose(s) will it serve? Write your answers down and look at them from time to time as you write. (By the way, it’s OK to want to write a book simply to entertain people; the noblest art has sprung from just such a humble desire.)
Then she looked at me as if startled and confused. Having awakened, she told me she had a dream that her mom was here and she was showing her some flowers she had just cut from her garden. She told me all about the dream, and she remembered every detail of it - even what her mom was wearing and the color of the flowers. She said it seemed so real, and it was like her mom was sitting right there next to her on the bed. We talked about it for a few minutes, then I kissed her and tucked her back into bed. I told her what a gift dreams like that are, and how they comfort us and help us to remember. I went back to bed thinking how lucky she was to have such vivid dreams about her mom. Those are the kind of dreams you treasure, because it's almost like having her back for just a moment.
Also, I’ve woken up sore the past two days. Not TOO sore, but sore. And I’ve also looked a lot ‘tighter’ in the mirror during my morning check-outs, so that’s good. I’m thinking I’ll take a photo every Monday, to see if we can spot gradual differences. We’ll see how I feel on Monday about that.
Today was challenge number two in the 30 Day Challenge on You, Me and Charlie.
I just walk in and, at the end of the show, the performer usually stands at the door to collect money in a bucket.
"Another thirty seconds."
Working with my solitaire plugin (SBH-SOLO) for Song of Blades and Heroes has been great fun, and I almost finished it before deadline, which is today!
You do everything you can to forget,
More reliable accounts maintain that Leo was taken prisoner by the Normans after the battle, and that he was held at Benevento for nine months, making his stay in Sessa impossible, unless he fled there before being captured. Sessa Aurunca is perhaps half the way to Rome from Civitate, and it seems unlikely that a successful flight that far would go unmentioned even in the briefest accounts of the battle and its aftermath. (I suppose it's helpful to remember that in hagiography, truth is often metaphorical rather than literal.)
The cars, the house, the cash,
Loveliest of Trees
Cute. But it left me wondering – who are they trying to starve out? The greedy aggregators, or consumers, or both? And how will consumers of NewsCorp’s media products react when they are shut out?
On a more positive note, when I’m done doing 100000 push ups I’m going to start writing scripts for some stories I’ve been keeping on my USB so I’ll probably write and develop sitcom scripts or short movies. Something to pass the time, seeing as I have 5 months off. I plan to write my first full length radio script this summer and then try and send it to a radio company thingy…going to need to research that one.
Seth
We have been working with Jimmy’s grandmother to try to get her to take him after school gets out. She still has not committed to doing that. As we sat down tonight and discussed it, I suddenly couldn’t hold back anymore. I asked Jimmy what it was that was making everyone feel suspicious of him. I asked him why his half-sister and grandmother were worried about having him around. He shrugged his shoulders. I answered my own question by letting him know that I believed that the problem was in that he was still making questionable choices. Then I told him I was very angry at him for something he did yesterday. After some beating around the bush, he indicated something with the dolls. I probed a bit further. His response was that he had positioned them to be hugging. Now he had admitted to positioning them, but they weren’t hugging and the twisting of their arms indicated that their position was anything but a natural “hug” or the effect of their hands slipping or moving, and they certainly hadn’t been dropped or thrown into the position they were in. There was no mistaking, in my mind, that his sick little mind had thought this was an amusing performance, and I am sure he got quite the kick out of it– after all, he is no stranger to pornography, which I find deplorable. I lost my mind. I was shaking with anger. I asked him what could have possessed him to create such an inappropriate scene for my children, in their room, with their toys. (Give it a second to think about it… how would YOU have taken it?) I told him I was so furious that I wanted to beat him senseless. I told him that I was not an idiot, that I was a mother with a very keen intuition about things in my life. I was irate. I told him that I was tempted to kick him out of the house right then. I told him that I knew this wasn’t an unintentional circumstance and asked him who he expected to find it and what we had expected to have happen. At one point, he all but admitted he had done it and seemed very shameful. I told him that he wasn’t worth me putting my children in jeopardy, especially after taking all of our hospitality and the opportunities we had given him for granted. I told him that my number one priority was to protect my children and that from day one I had made it clear that the minute he puts my kids in harm’s way, he would be out of my house. I told him it would have to be my husband pacifying me to let him stay. I also let him know, in no uncertain terms, that he would be lucky to remain in our house until June 8.
This leads to another point. It’s inexact to say that genetic introgression speeds up evolution. Rather, it speeds up evolution along a certain trajectory … to the detriment of other possible trajectories.
-Check Hot Spots (my desk, kitchen counters)
georg
The parade of innocent people being killed by their own family members continues. Today I read that Jason “J.T.” Ready, a white supremacist and founder of the militia group US Border Guard, killed three adults and a child before turning a gun on himself.
Not giving birth naturally to Linnea didn't cause me to grieve missing
fly
Best of all, the opportunity to engage your target audience by way of “latest and greatest marketing” is probably nearly always right under your nose.
Their talk ran quickly away from Iona’s predicament and focused on their shared love for books… and then for the popular music in Dublin… and then for the theatre. Before she knew it, Iona had forgotten her worries about Lord Covington and was chatting animatedly about the things she loved. Her dark eyes sparkled and she pushed her hair absently away from her face as she warmed up to the subject.
Brewed by the Big Boss Brewing Company in Raleigh, North Carolina. The thing that drew me to Bad Penny was the label and branding of the beer and brewery. As a designer I am always looking for things that excite and inspire me and this is one of those times. The design is fantastic and one of the better options in the craft beer world. All of Big Boss's brews have this same kind of design and feel. Very cool.
Yes and no. We had to be home on time or we would be grounded for a day for each minute we were late (which didn't happen because of the punishment), we had a bedtime, we had rules and we had chores. I think my parents were strict enough but not crazy strict.
22 What Will This Evening Bring Me This Morning 2:18
Misery (Loves Company)
Technically not a grain (actually a seed of a leafy plant related to spinach and beets), quinoa can be a substitute for nearly any grain in cooking. Packed with protein, quinoa is a good source of fiber and is easily digested. Quinoa also contains every amino acid, and is particularly rich in lysine (which promotes healthy tissue growth throughout the body), and is a good source of iron, magnesium, vitamin E, potassium, and fiber.
Fold over each unfinished edge of the front and back panel about 1/2". Place the velcro over the folded edges and sew. Sew the velcro for the top panel onto the wrong side of the fabric, and the velcro for the bottom panel onto the right side of the fabric. When the sunsuit is facing down, both velcro pieces should be facing you.
“Add a free Flag Counter to any webpage and collect flags from all over the world. Every time someone from a new country visits you, a flag will be added to your counter. Not only will this make your site far more interesting, but clicking on your Flag Counter will reveal amazing information and charts!”
The crisp details in this historical novel breathe life into a pivotal time in American history. Through characters, trials and plot, the author navigates a story that connects God, family and country, leaving readers with a greater appreciation for the blessings of liberty.
Community Reporter Kevin Gallagher was asked the following question recently –
A city that was named Fatehabad, but is known today as Fatehpur Sikri.
Dawn Media Group
Supplies - all products CTMH - Card size is 4 1/4" x 5 1/2"
The market standard airline structure involves the following departments in an airline. The line personnel, operations, technic and maintenance, sales and marketing, reservation and ticketing, staff personnel and sub-contractors.
I recently got a job where I had to do some things that previous versions of EnRoute couldn't handle. My client wanted a horse's head. I had downloaded an STL mesh file of a horse head some time ago and routed a sample. My client loved it but we needed it to top a post instead of being a wall mount.
Mixed Green Salad with 1 tablespoon of olive oil or one avocado.
Or, her morning.
“It’s always really tough playing on Sundays whether you’re in the lead or middle of the pack, and today I was fighting, trying to win an event, and I think I showed myself a good bit out there,” Dufner said. “It was tough. Ernie made a great run at me and it felt like with five or six holes (to go) we were probably going to be battling for the win.”
District Leader 52nd A.D. Jo Anne Simon
Caught in a dizzying whirl of dusty backpacks, hawker-stall cuisine and a milling mass of humanity, the Sukhothai offers a soothing urban sanctuary. Grand architectural gestures are spread over a bountiful six acres and recall the 12th-century Kingdom of Sukhothai. Think Old World temple meets contemporary luxury. Though the hotel is large, the design creates a sense of private space, so the pace is contemplative rather than harried. Every detail is conducive to reflection. Despite high-tech digital perks in the suites, the hotel still follows traditional lines, such as the near-ceremonial turning-down of the bed each night. Refresh your senses at the luxurious 25-metre infinity outdoor pool, set within a lushly landscaped tropical courtyard.
Guadalajara – get used to pronouncing this title because you will most likely be recommending this to your own friends and family too!
3) Running is psychological. I have MAJOR completion and goal issues. I will tear my body apart in order to beat someone to a finish line. Knowing this helps me to make better “long term” decisions about how I run. I know that I can let myself fail at a goal and live to run again another day. What kind of runner are you? Are you compulsive? Are you tough to motivate? Recognize who you are and how you are making decisions to run or not. You don’t need to change your personality – just be aware that these deeper needs in us inform our decisions.
bake for approx 1 hour, checking from 45 minutes on with a toothpick in the center.
The hours I am awake are too short
70. The Prince of Tides - Pat Conroy
37. Who was the best new person you met?
Hope you have a blast!!
Then there’s the famous running down the hill and accidentally stepping on a nesting duck in my bare feet with no where to go but water.
Meanwhile, LimeWire’s parent company, Lime Group, is prepping a new music service that it says will be legal, and should be due out in a month.
Whatever happens I’m heading out this morning to get about 4 miles in. I’d rather run outside in the light rain (as it is now) than run on the treadmill because of heavier rain or sleet. Plus I have a whole rack of housework to do and doing my run first will put me in better fettle for that.
19. Bustin' Surfboards - The Lively Ones
They also seized police boots, reflector jackets and a South African National Defence Force uniform. - Sapa
I wasn't going to do this but Ghostie made me(by making me a runner up in the blog category) - What I do of course mean is that Ghostie inspired me to stop feeling sorry for myself - cheers buddy.
But let this not blind you to what virtue there is;
Keep in mind this is a few months after the release of her breakthrough film 'Alien', whose sequel (which she also starred in) was directed by James Cameron, who would also find later inspiration on sunken ships. Although I think most of us prefer her as a Hollywood star, Weaver's off-Broadway credits were so impressive by this time that New York Magazine referred to her in 1981 as "just about the best all-purpose actress in town."
Shoppers can also get inspiration from fabulous clothes and brilliant beauty buys that will be showcased in glass display cases dotted around Cabot Circus and Quakers Friars.
Entree (no pictures):
5. R2-D2 We Wish You A Merry Christmas
I would tell you about this moment I had at the end of the night. The meeting was over, the afterglow was finished, and I was helping Paul and Kenny put the rest of the equipment in the locker… and I had a moment.
Lees Creek / Buena Vista Ohio (east of cincinnati large odd shaped clutter ring return flash)
Here is a video where I talk about the tips and give you a tour of the system. I tried to write as clearly as I could in this post, but sometimes it’s better to just see it in action because it is tough to explain:
Justin Speier, Ryan Speier, David Cortes = 0 points
But I'm so happy to be back home in my own bed! My family is freaking crazy and kept the air so. Damn. Low. (Love you guys!) But if you're wondering just how low it was, my husband slept with a shirt and pants on. Never has he ever in our entire relationship slept in more than boxers. Yeah. That cold.
Metal/pot ban
Those eyes will get me everytime. You can be quite stubborn and won't let up until you get EXACTLY what you want. Attached to your momma is an understatement. You are one BIG ole momma's boy. Biting your friends at school comes and goes. Hopefully this trend won't last too long.
Thank you for coming by. Take care
Stop It Now! Helpline: Call Before You Sexually Abuse a Child
* No owners have the same pet, smoke the same brand of cigar or drink the same drink.
Prior to launching Andress Consulting, Kristin enjoyed a ten-year career with Arthur Andersen, serving as Director of Tax and Legal–Performance and Learning. She led global operations of a fifty-two person team in the United States and had coordination oversight of twenty-five people in Cambridge, England, and Asia/Pacific, with responsibility for a multi-million dollar budget.
is to stay on the board as long as possible.
Having recently moved my art festival booth furnishings to the perimeter of this space, I hatched this wild idea last week of converting this into a studio space to accommodate more than one person. That idea filled some of the space of my Spring Break. I especially enjoy now the presence of a portable TV/VCR where I have been rolling interview tapes of Willem de Kooning. I’m also benefiting from my vintage stereo and turntable (LOVE listening to Muddy Waters LPs!). I also have several easels upon which I can put up my works in progress and view them from across the garage while I’m working on something else. I have two bookcases filled with my art, literature and philosophy monographs, as well as a number of comfortable chairs and reading lamps, along with five tables with ample space for organizing paintings, art supplies, journal, laptop and whatever else I need. I feel that I could compete with Robert Motherwell as to library/studio/office space, though I could no doubt have used a portion of his financial fortune for a “prettier, classier’” space.
So, in return, I wrote a thank you note and took back to the spa so that it could be given with the return of the glasses to "Irene". In the note I told her just how much her kind gesture meant to me...and that I'd like to repay her if she'd allow me to host her a Tea Party for 4 in her home. She excitedly phoned me within days after getting the card and accepted my offer. I got approval for an adjusted schedule with work for that day (April 18th) ..and I'm out to meet "4" new friends that I believe I'm "destined" to meet.
But silently wish all away like puff.
in place. After the glue was dry, I also nailed it. Then I took a piece of
However, not all the 'exhibits' were well-behaved. The Borough Librarian complained in 1937 that the Museum's monkey had bitten staff and public alike!
i happen to be a vegan, big whoop. that does not give me the right to run around blogland judging others who are not. most of the blogs i read have nothing to do with being vegan. i read them b/c i like them and they are nice people. i read food blogs that are not vegan all the time. i love them b/c they give me great ideas for recipes that i can make my own. i read blogs that are all about frivolous fashion and decorating and i love them!
"Hey Jenny if we found some candy on the ground but it was still in the wrapper could we eat it? WE DIDN'T REALLY find any but IF WE DID could we eat it?" (asked with hands behind backs)
The man couldn’t get over how a small patch of flowers grew there where she had died almost over night, and not one weed would move in to take over the ugly burned lot again. It had been a house from hell for him. His father had beaten and abused him there until the day he ran away. Many years had gone by, his father was dead a long time now. He came back to town to have the house torn down and to sell the lot for the back taxes. He had been trying to do the right thing, laying the past to rest. He hadn’t planned on raping and killing the woman who looked at him and the house with such disgust. The old memories just came flooding back of his father raping him as a boy and he lashed out in pain and anger. He did the same thing to someone else that had been done to him…
The parting of hat from hair,
"We need to set an example. We're spending too much time, year in, year out, discussing what we are going to do and when we are going to do it. Let's do it now. No more discussion. It needs to be done."
Oh yeah. On that walk in the woods behind his house, Hudson dispatched a dangerous feral dog with the firearm he always carried with him. After reading this memoir, I'd have given him odds-on chances of offing the beast with his bare hands.
ERIC IDLE / NEIL INNES - RUTLAND WEEKEND SONGBOOK
Several days ago, we were alerted by the NOAA weather system to be watchful for Flash Flooding. Huh??? We are sitting outside on the deck, NOT in rain, noting how dark the sky was to the north of us, just WISHING for rain, but none landed on our little space. Again, that danged radio went off, 4 or 5 times and we were right in the area of "flash floods". Obviously, the NOAA folks have missed the mark we are thinking!!! We are in a semi-arid climate, and the words "flash floods" sound like a joke to ignorant me. Next day at work, I began to hear horror stories from only 7 miles north of here. Water, washing roads out, calves swept away, 6-10 inches of hail and rain on the road! -- all traffic having to pull over with flashers on. The country road grader was called out to clear the roads from field debris! And we were oblivious of the storm the whole time. Yikes - So we went for a drive the next day to see what we could see. There wasn't much to be seen except for a lot of crud caught in fences in low areas and evidence of much-needed water. This was the beautiful storm sky, the day after. The farmers were very appreciative for the rain, just not so much at one time!!
Irvin, Kay. “The Three Coffins.” New York Times. October 6, 1935.
It was great meeting Mike and I think the shop's great. Why not a skate/flower/dry goods shop? Why not take a space that actually HAS been underutilized, despite what it had been, and make it something entirely new in context while working within the existing space. Re-purposing at it's finest in my opinion.
It created an even larger mass of swarming ‘bees’. A side note, even though there were more planes on Friday it took even longer for the swarm to really thin out.
2 aren
Going to be using Very aggressive BRM. I want 12 BIs for each level of the micros. Once at 25nl i will wait until bankroll is 1k to shot take at 50nl.
He has filled the hungry with good things
O, my America, my new found land,
Press Release: from £ 10.00
“Five years ago, my wife and I moved from a large metropolitan area to a small, remote western area in the mountains and have developed an off the grid homestead. We are practicing self sufficiency, conservation, organic gardening, and learning to live more simply.
I chose to slip down to block 4 to stitch in February, because it just seems so Valentine-y to me. The lady in her red dress, waiting for her love. Awwwwww. I'm calling this block the "Ghost and Mrs. Muir" block. It just reminds me of the house in the old Gene Tierney movie!
*Joanna who enjoys a glass of merlot in the middle of the afternoon.
You know my heart for my husband. You know when I'm glad to be married to him and You know when I'm not so happy about being committed to him. With the demands of children and life sometimes I forget him, Lord. I forget why I was so giggly about him and what we did before we were married. Help me to remember. Restore what we have lost and grow us beyond what we can imagine. Forgive me for missing opportunities to encourage him and for the times when I chose to tear him down instead. Help me to work on myself rather than always trying to "fix" him. I want to love being his wife, just as I want to love being a mom. Help me to persevere when times are tough. Please help us both to grow into the couple You want us to be. Trusting You as I begin again, I pray in Jesus' Name. Amen.
Iker and the ‘keepers: Iker, Adán, Mejías.
Missoula Children’s Theatre presents Hansel and Gretel
I think I’d like to be a secret shopper.
I have really struggled the past several days.
Of course, the various venues and suppliers and retailers and other assorted good beer folk did their collective bit and offered all types of assistance and logistics, but this piece is really just a sort of ‘virtual time capsule’ to ensure that those who were there in the very beginning get the credit they so beerily deserve.
Our Thursday morning classes are going well. We are making a sampler quilt using a variety of techniques - watch this space for progress.
And how do I plan to use these spoons, you ask? Well, I did use a few the other day to make a flower (inspired by a tutorial from none other than Dr Sonia!), but I ended up experimenting it to death. I do plan to revisit the idea, tho...I'll probably end up using them to make a little spoon-bouquet embellishment (just waiting for the perfect project!). I'd really like to bind a piano-hinge book with spoons, but I think I'll want those long "soda" spoons for that...hmm, where can I find those for "free"‽
There are, of course, men that don’t like the women playing such a strong role. One of them, Shane, becomes a dangerous foe to Katie when she has to kill his brother after he becomes infected. It’s in Shane and his cohort that we see a more dismissive attitude toward women and other people in general. Shane and Phillip are great at entering the zombie-infested towns and salvaging for supplies and serve the community well, but their attitudes toward women, especially bisexual Katie, creates serious problems for the burgeoning society. Shane and Phillip challenge the rules of the new society with their behavior. One particularly upsetting scene between Shane and Katie immediately causes a rift among the people in the fort as people take sides in a “he said, she said” battle.
Does he not list my blog, because he does not want me to be “advertised” on it?
Faye was born in the UK. Her mother is Grenadian and Faye was a baby when the events I've been relating took place. The film is about her own personal search for truth and understanding and she hopes that it can be screened on TV to coincide with Black History Month in October.
Which is what Her Majesty calls them.
Papers - American Crafts - Enchanted pad; card stock
As I think about my faith, my heritage in the story of God, and all the promises that God made and delivered (the promise to Abraham and Sarah of a son despite their old age and Abraham’s faith despite this!), none is as amazing to me as the promise and birth of Christ, The Messiah. I imagine the virgin Mary sitting in the stable holding the newly delivered infant, Jesus in her inexperienced arms being a mother for the first time, witnessing a miracle and holding the God’s promise. It’s just another reminder to me that shows how capable God is of delivering His promises than the delivery of our newborn King through the virgin Mary.
Did you know you can get a complete list of upcoming challenges at the beginning of each month in our monthly newsletter “Bugaboo News” You can subscribe Email
A Lord, for fuck's sake.
Me Made May 2012 outfit 4, Wednesday 9th May 2012: Simplicity 2591 made from Joel Dewberry Majestic Oak fabric and worn with necklace from Aspire Style, red shoes from Topshop and Ness Ebony bag
“The direct descent of the essential program of the Esoteric Schools was entrusted to groups already well-conditioned for the work. The guilds, trade unions, and similar protective and benevolent Societies had been internally strengthened by the introduction of a new learning. The advancement of the plan required the enlargement of the boundaries of the philosophic overstate. A World Fraternity was needed, sustained by a deep and broad program of education according to the “method”. Such a Fraternity could not immediately include all men, but it could unite the activities of certain kinds of men, regardless of their racial or religious beliefs or the nations in which they dwelt. These were the men of “towardness”, those sons of tomorrow, whose symbol was a blazing sun rising over the mountains of the east. (…)
My introduction this round:
2. Create a contact list – Build your knowledge and a list of contacts who you can rely upon and trust. When business is slow there are more fly-by-night companies and they will smell fresh blood. To avoid being caught in their scams, always ask people you know for a contact. If you don’t know plumbing you should have a best friend who is a plumber. Even if they’re not doing the work they can provide you with pointers and valuable advice.
3. No-one is fooled by your addiction
“All I can do is hope to move forward with my life and become a better person.”
Whether or not you want to admit it, a crisis of faith is something that many of us go through. Even the most unlikely people.
As a friend of mine recently mentioned on Facebook,
REM The one I love US
Thankfully, I had my rule to guide me. I ditched 500 words of Dillen thinking and sitting and looking, and replaced it with about four sentences of essential set-up, linking action scene A with action scene B. And you know what? It was fun to write, and I'm pretty sure it will be a lot more fun for the reader to read too.
23. My mother taught me about my ROOTS.
Later on I had Meatball send me a couple of volunteers with mops to clean up the mess. They did a fine job without griping (which is always a plus) and hopefully kept some of the water from leaking down into the offices down stairs.
One more thing about this player. He took everything personally. Those who know me might perceive something similar. I think it’s a gift. For Mays, he lived for baseball. He took every boo, every slight, and every critique to heart. Why shouldn’t he? He was giving it his all day in and day out. If he screwed up, well, it was a personal screw up. I don’t disagree. Criticize my performance, and I’m going to feel personally responsible. I try to bring my A game, and when I am doing it, and I don’t get desired results, of course disappointment sets in. If it doesn’t then I think that demonstrates a cavalier attitude that shows a lack of investment in the results. Players today are often that way. Mays never was and everyone knew he was great because of the heart he brought to his work. That’s a good role model if you ask me.
Note: This article was first published in the old Temasek Review in March 2010
I also want to make it clear that I don't, and didn't when I was still in my teens (having just turned 20 a couple of months ago, I still have trouble remembering I'm no longer a teen!), tell my parents everything. I'm my own person, with my own life, and some things stay private. Sometimes because it's something very personal, or a secret not mine to share, and sometimes it's because I know it would worry or upset them to know something. Yes, occasionally I keep things (and have kept things in the past) I know my parents would disapprove of away from them, not because of any fear that I would "get in trouble" or anything like that, but simply because I don't want them upset or worried about things they ultimately have no control over.
Certainty/comfort: We need to be comfortable and certain. Of course, absolute certainty is not possible, but we want to know that our life is not likely to be turned drastically upside down anytime soon.
Clearly, folly has its attractions. Therefore on May 31st I will be incorporating this talk into a one day event in Bristol on integrated marketing.
Now even at 1.30 in the morning, half asleep, hiding under the covers clutching my hot water bottle for defence against invaders, it occured to me that if my husband can work all that out by simply standing naked listening to a wall, why can't he find a pair of socks, neatly paired and folded in his underwear drawer?
The Long & The Short were from Ashton-in-Makerfield near Manchester. We already had a non-45 track from "Gonks Go Beat" on vol. 1. Here comes the flip of the second and last single. We'll probably meet them again on a future volume. +++
This year Friday the 13th falls on January 13, April 13, and July 13. Even worse for those who are spooked by the number 13, those three dates are exactly 13 weeks apart this year — first time it’s happened since 1984, and it won’t happen again till 2040. Three times exactly 13 weeks apart happens only every seventh leap year (every 28 years). A triple occurrence usually happens only every 11 years, so the 2012 and 2015 triple occurrences are unusual. The preceding triples were in 1998, 2009 and the succeeding one will be in 2026.
Morals of the Post:
Verna can never… ever… live in a home with steps. Ever. Verna’s stifles don’t extend. Who knows why – doctors say its a genetic defect. I dont really care. She’s sweet and adorable -
He also wrote us a love song. It’s reserved for us alone, His bride. It’s the greatest song ever written, because it’s authored by the One who is the very essence of love and creativity. This song is meant to draw us unto Him, to know Him on a deeper level. That’s His desire. He wants us to fall in love with Him, to love Him the way He loves us. This song is a catalyst to bring us into perfect union with Him. Revelation 15:3 mentions the song of the Lamb, and I believe The Song of Solomon is this song. It’s about our journey with Him. It’s about His complete and perfect love for us, and about our journey to becoming the bride that Our Father God intended His Son to have. What a mystery! Perfect union. Perfect love.
A good friend of mine, Tara, showed me pictures of the "Blurb Book" that she created with all of her wedding planning ideas! I thought it was such a wonderful thing to do and wanted to share with all of you.
*West Coast Literary Associates (also d/b/a California Literary Services)
Do you ever feel like the universe is giving you a wake up call? Yesterday I was texting back and forth with my cousin, who I pretty much talk to every single day and she is basically my Yoda. She knows every thing, I’m sure we all have those cousins or friends, but she’s the wise and thoughtful Dorothy to my silly and La-De-Da Rose. Anytime I have a problem, I take it to her and she bestows upon me her great advise. I was venting and sulking about how certain people in my life don’t seem to really respect me and how it always hurts my feelings that I try so hard and still am not “good enough”, wah wah wah, woe is me, right? I was having an Eeyore kind of day, gross… I know. Anyway, she told me that I needed to say how I felt, that it was silly to MAKE myself take things over and over again and be miserable just for the sake of “keeping peace”. It’s not really keeping peace if YOU feel miserable and not at peace! I pouted for a few minutes more and then the little light bulb flickered…Huh, she’s right! One of my favorite quotes has always been “The only way someone can make you feel inferior is if you let them.” So WHY was I just shaking it off and letting it roll off my skin? Why do I feel the need to be the bigger person, when being the bigger person means being the person who is sad later? That’s just silly! I decided “I should really change that about myself!” last night, and then went to bed not thinking anything more of it… Dun dun dun.
resist checking this place
When Frank chose to make him dance
This battle is now being played out in most American public institutions. “Tocquevillians and Gramscians clash on almost everything that matters. Tocquevillians believe that there are objective moral truths applicable to all people at all times. Gramscians believe that moral ‘truths’ are subjective and depend upon historical circumstances. Tocquevillians believe in personal responsibility. Gramscians believe that ‘the personal is political.’ In the final analysis, Tocquevillians favor the transmission of the American regime; Gramscians, its transformation.”
Volunteers will actually stand by the side of the road and grab turtles who try to step out into the traffic.
15. Sweet Caroline
When all the kids arrived and the doors were locked, I had some food, gossiped with some other parents and then hung out at the Minute To Win It with a neighbor lady, retrieving tennis balls. As soon as the kids went into the auditorium at 3 to see the magic show, the rest of us worked hard to get things put away and get the high school back into some semblance of order, then I needed to leave before I fell down.
On another "pink" note, the on-line auction for the Pink Wishbone Project started yesterday... you have until October 28th to make a bid on one of these fabulous, one-of-a-kind chairs.
* Sayid looks for MIB, the jungle begins to move. The wind blowing circular, in an instant Sayid is face to face with MIB. MIB says hello and then Sayid plunges the dagger into MIB’s chest. MIB pulls it out and says, why did you go and do that.
April 8– Tuesday– New Madrid, Missouri– Confederate troops surrender Island #10 in the Mississippi River. Federal forces edge closer to driving a wedge into the Confederacy. Union troops take about 7,000 rebel prisoners as well as seizing more than three dozen artillery pieces and lots of ammunition. Union losses are 23 dead and 50 wounded.
Did I mention that it was on the night right before M's birthday party? The guests and their parents were very gracious about holding their breath and the fact that they left reeking of skunk (that smell gets into everything).
“Boku to Star no 99 Nichi” (Fuji TV) also returned to the same time slot as “Nankyoku Tairiku” and immediately lost 1.8% (now 7.8%), which is a new season-low for the drama. Maybe they should change their Sunday drama to a 10:00 pm time slot.
My mom would have stayed another 3 days at least! However, my dad, a country boy through and through, was ready go home! He was not so impressed with the hustle and bustle of city life. Added to that, he developed a head cold. He was more than ready to get home. It was wait and see until Sat morning. When they left, all flights were "On Time". However, by the time they were almost to Orlando, their flight back to Indianapolis had been delayed. While they were supposed to get to Indy at 8:30, turned out to be more like midnight! It was 2:30 am before they finally made it to their house! It was a very long day for my grandpa, but he did it without complaining!
2 drew
- In Venice all gondolas have to be painted black unless they belong to a high ranking official.
ISBN-10: 0062077902
Card Review: 8.4 It doesn't show up well in the scan, but this card has a "gold" foil stamped signature on the front. It actually looks quite a bit better than the "silver" in person. Everything else is identical to the base card.
Manchester United have a very handy habit of finding good form when it comes towards the end of campaigns.
Who follows in His train?
Had a really nice family reunion with all my cousins and this was unusual because we usually did this at Christmas time, so was a beautiful day spent outside by the pool and just enjoyed reconnecting. The times of fun were few and far between so I really appreciated them when they happened. My boat was also in an “in water boat sale show” although nothing transpired from it.
No hidden
“It occurred to me that while it must have been wonderful for these girls to begin with,” he says, “what happened 25 years later when they were freezing in a house in Cheshire, aching for Long Island? That was where it all started — with the idea of a woman bringing up her children in a culture different to hers.’”
I have heard of a blog crush, but didn't know what it meant util now....LOL
As always, authors, illustrators, agents, editors, librarians, etc. are welcome! A chance to come together and chat about writing, reading, illustrating, and the children's writing industry.
This book was SPECIFICALLY meant to appeal to:
Everybody wants to find the best worth for his/her cash. If you’re a consumer, you so want to know the various ways to locate deep discount rates on buying. Finding an inexpensive & greatest deal is this type of tough job. Isn’t this? Only couple of people understand certain tips to find the best offers. If a person observe very carefully, getting a great deal is really not every that mess with. You simply need to do a little bit of research. But the actual question is finding them? Cheap daily deals are available at numerous places. These days there are numerous of websites which are specifically focused on promotional items at reduced prices and assist you in finding the greatest deals around. You can easily see the whole listing of what these people sell to help you see when there is anything you are looking at or not really. They have a number of items to help you easily look for the ones you would like.
The toss of a coin…? I doubt it. Instead, I think we’ll just sleep on it and see where tomorrow takes us; how life presents itself another day. As for yesterday, it is a lesson learned…if we’re paying attention. Today is a gift that might or might not affect the next day. I for one am always thankful for another day.
-Like the wings of ordinary generalized winged insects, e.g. as the image at this link.
Sentiment and stamping on tag - Dawn Bibby
There are no words left to speak
Time: 11:25 to 12:00
Gathering.
3. Shear Enterprises — St. Petersburg, Fla. (CEO Rhonda Shear)
Although all around us the unbelievers detest,
The following paragraphs begin with the full text of the reviewers’ comments, and then continue into my responses. I have proofread the text of the reviewers’ comments shown below. As far as I can tell, all typographical and other errors in the reviewers’ remarks, as shown here, were in the originals that I received from the journals.
I would like to “THANK” everyone that remembered me before and after surgery. The prayers, cards, flowers, food, visits, gifts and calls were very much appreciated. A special thanks to my family for being there for me and for all you’ve done. May God bless each one of you. Laurie Nack Bublitz
“In my time, there used to be a whole slew of Deadwood (S.D.) cities with enough action to make starving worthwhile. Now, after a rodeo, they spend an hour combing and blow-drying their hair to look pretty for the ladies.”
Well, to an extent. I think its proved with the moment when Sky looks up at the Doctor for the first time after she is possessed. Her head movements and the way she looks through him really was frightening.
4. Kokomo
1 cup sharp cheddar cheese, shredded
Now she's got somebody else and I can't sleep
This is something fairly new. The British have usually been able to manage without a police presence at polling stations, but not anymore. Along with massive postal vote fraud comes intimidation, courtesy of Islam — which does not of course place too much emphasis on democracy and man-made laws.
other factors, he felt that the actual performance venue
Batman (Danny Elfman)
Lee and I feel so amazingly blessed and cannot wait to share our beautiful daughter with all of you! Thank you for sharing this journey and praying with us every step of the way.. We head out on a 6:20am flight on Tuesday morning and arrive home on Wednesday! I will be sure to post as soon as I get back into my crazy life with 6 kids!!!
If this type of violent fruit coming from the movement isn’t enough to turn common sense against it, the movement also reveals as one faithful Catholic Sentinel commenter has recently noted, “cursing, disobedience to the law, drug use, rape, defecating on the American flag, filth, as well as public nudity.” Each and all, verifiable through various news and media outlets. Here’s a current leader of Occupy Portland at a recent family friendly event:
I think that the maid may well have blundered into (or been co-opted into) an attempt to steal DSK’s phone.
Bigger in size than either Microsoft or AT&T, Koch Industries tends to fly under the public radar screen. Yet as the Center has previously reported, Koch — which owns refineries that can process over 800,000 oil barrels a day, and operates some 4,000 miles of pipeline — is a prolific political donor. Today, Koch is the second-largest privately held company in America.
your make-believe. Thus it should come as no surprise that the man in
Apparently, I am not the only one who seems to prefer evil to affliction. When I was afflicted by being shut out of my birthfamily’s life, refused contact with them, I was in pain. Like Job (obviously not in the same volume), what I wanted was removed from me. I had lost my hope that my birthparents and I would some day meet, I lost six siblings, I lose an aunt who seemed to be tender towards me, I lost the opportunity to talk with them, to know them, to have my children know them, for them to know my children, for my two sets of parents to meet, . . . I had lost my dream of “everyone” coming together. I was also losing in my marriage. Things were not good/great there; he was trying to stay in tune with me, but he was struggling with his own very big stuff too. I lost my energy, my interest in life, my approval from many, my hope, –ultimately, I lost my self-worth.
Most ‘modern’ science fiction spends a lot of time explaining “why”: Star Trek explains why they traveled through time, Inception explains why their dream machine works, Avatar tries to explain why everything is so blue. But John Carter takes a much more old-school approach, asking “why not?” Can Mars have ships that fly on light instead of sailing on water? – Why not? - How about a nomadic race of green Martian people? - Why not? - Giant, blind, six legged white ape’s in a gladiator pit? - Sure! Why not!
I believe that we have an ethical obligation to try and make this relationship work. We need to eat less meat so that it can be raised in a way that “evens the score.” We need to breed not only for production, but for health, reproductive fitness, and soundness. But most of all, we have got to be willing to sacrifice for these animals on some level in order to balance out the sacrifices they made and continue to make for us.
So there you go. Want to see what all the fuss is about? Get your backsides down to the Royal Albion at midnight on September 30th (obviously you will need to be an official attendee at the convention to be allowed admittance).
Jeff rode with a winning attitude all day long and made a good, good effort on that initial 500 meter grade to the finish, but the grade does eat up your legs and 1K at high intensity is a loooong way. In retrospect we did not organize well as a team over the final 3k, but it was our first group test of the season like this and I think it will stand us in good stead in upcoming big races. Communication before and during the race needs to improve (me!) and I think our deep resource of talent will marshal itself to put one of us on the podium soon.
Thank you so much to everyone who has been stopping bye to see my creations, for following me and for any comments you have left. Happy Thursday :)
And kids and dog and I spill out
How do you tell a story with images? This question perplexed the research and development team for the new children’s book titled WHO KNEW? (to be released late 2012/early 2013). So the team traveled to Amherst, MA last week to gather information and experiences for the book and began answering their question.
Kieran Nicholson
Mearls: That's a great question. We want magical to feel magical yet rooted in the world. The cantrip thing ties into this. Cantrips aren't specifically made to blast people, but a cantrip you use to create a small amount of acid as part of an alchemy experiment can also be a useful weapon. Spells should feel magical and maybe
Out and about
I’m glad this is my last semester of piano. I’ve enjoyed getting some basic skills down, but now the class itself is just a burden…I’m tired of it. Voice lessons after piano let out was a blessing, though. It was my first voice lesson of the semester with a pianist present, so it was likewise my first time to hear the piano parts of the songs I’ve been working on (with the exception of “Sunset Boulevard”, of course). Speaking of SB, I’m officially signed up to sing it at the voice area recital this Thursday! Super excited, and I’ll make sure to have Conner record it on my phone or something.
Doc tells me my cholesteral is fine ... so it's okay to indulge in decandence every once in a while!
Mozart – Symphony no.32, KV 318
This is one of those jobs that needed to be done, but no one will really see it.
And it's within that two page story that we had the game changer. Steve Rogers offers Brian a place on The Avengers. Not instantly popular with all of his team-mates. Well... with Pete Wisdom, anyway. But he comes around to it...
Other topics included building community among cancer survivors, a few different sessions on connecting passionate sports fans, engaging citizens in scientific discovery, music fans across the web bonding over their first concert and how passionate social media users can make a difference any day.
We zoomed home, and my little sparkle goth tore off her normal clothes and put on her new duds, including some black (non-sparkly) leggings she already had. She was so excited by the completed ensemble, I was afraid she might explode. While gazing at herself lovingly in the mirror, she said, "I look HOT!" I thought BH might keel over.
"Why do you carry that sign?"
Jon Stewart has been doing this for years. Since the Daily Show came on air in 1999, it has been poking jabs at everyone from Newt Gingrich of 1999, to Newt Gingrich of 2012. Not to mention the three Presidents, several Secretaries of State, and countless others in between.
Next, I apologize for all of you who try to comment on the different blogs (Kayla's, Kayla's and mine together, and this one) and can't. There doesn't seem to be an explanation for this, other than the fact that computers and the web must hate me. :) I've got an amazing web guru guy who handles our websites and it's not his fault. He makes everything work when I mess it up - So it's obvious that I somehow freak everything out.
And at the end of the course, they are awarded a qualification.
May 1st always feels like the beginning of summer, of many colours green, of music and sunlight and magic. As I drove down the mountain this morning I saw a marmot running up the rocks by the side of the road. I switched on KGNU, the local radio station, and found myself in the middle of passionate and intense music. It was viscerally familiar but unidentifiable (this I so often find to be the case). I got as far as “it’s a piano trio, 19th century”….but no further before the announcer relieved me:
Like the mouse, rats establish territories and colonies. The dominant male continuously guards his harem of females and aggressively prevents other males from mating. Females actively defend their group against strangers and often nest together. Their nests are constructed from leaves, paper, rags, twigs, or anything else they can find. Rats are nocturnal, but in areas having large rat populations some low ranked rats will forage during the day, because other rats have denied them access to food at night.
Go on, join the fun!
I would really like to do this once a week but we will see where it goes. So another reason why you might not see me on here as much. I've got to come up with some fabulous ideas! Check out our first craft....
Thai women and Thai people in general, see a pleasure to meet each other. This is what Thai women call freedom.
In the final chapter, Tetsuzo tracks down his missing girls and enlists help from an old friend Ikeda (Shirô Namiki) to set up an interview with Kumiko as a client wanting to play a father, with Noriko and Yuka as the daughters. But he may have made a fatal mistake when he decides to hire Kumiko to play his deceased wife Taeko. In a dramatic ending, Ikeda sends Kumiko away to the store while Teutsuzo tries to reunite his family, but Kumiko suspects something is wrong and that Tetsuzo may be behind it all. Tetsuzo, alone with his daughters fears that they may be beyond saving when they have both been brainwashed to be essentially empty shells trained to play certain characters for their clients on queue. As strange as this movie is, the climactic ending is probably the most bizarre and it doesn’t end at all the way you’d think or expect.
So has anyone else had that experience--re-reading a book and not remembering anything about it? Or should I be consulting a memory specialist?
I was talking to young man the other day, his first child will be born later this year. He is ready to settle down and start a family but where he sees difficulty, job uncertainty and not enough money, I see opportunity and independence. When I was his age I thought that a baby must be born into a family using newly bought clothes and equipment. I know now it makes no difference whether what you have is new or old, what matters is that baby is loved and the family it's born into is stable. Stability, love and calmness will see every baby through. All a baby really needs is to be fed, to be warm and secure and held in loving arms. Everything they need can be gratefully accepted secondhand from friends and family, or made for a fraction of the shop price. Babies, as well as older children, are not deprived by this way of life, they thrive in it. Looking on Freecycle or in op shops, and telling your family and friends you're looking for certain items, will open up a new world, and show you that when security and love are provided in full measure, happy healthy babies thrive, even when there is very little money.
Salt - 1/2 tsp
Another Birthday. Last night we celebrated my FIL’s birthday. The entire family couldn’t attend though since the kids have after school activities; Julian has baseball practice and Sabrina has tennis. Awww… So we’re going to do the real celebrating on Sunday, though I feel all celebrated out. HA!
hot tea
Despite the room spinning rather alarmingly and an increasing nausea I remained entirely lucid.
Today, I am grateful for this education because I can tell you many little facts about Sri Lanka’s Buddhist history and significant archaeological sites, not because of the personal spiritual enlightenment it brought about.
Years ago, Josh used to rock climb with a girl (J) we went to college with. She got married, had a baby and Josh and I both moved to Utah and then got married. While I was in labor with Sierra, Josh and I happened to go for a walk to Target and run into this lady again. It turned out our kids were pretty close in age and she's the one who got me through the early days of nursing uncertainty with a first baby. Fast forward a bit, the family moved to Montana and we were sad :-( We ended up both having second babies pretty close together and then Josh got a job in, of all places, Montana! So we've been able to reconnect with this couple that we get along well with, plus it just so happens that between us we have 4 girls who are well matched age-wise.
If the economics and law movement were to become the standard in our legal culture, it would represent a massive upward redistribution of wealth. Not only would “transfer payments” – unemployment benefits, assistance for needy families and the like – be deemed unconstitutional, but so would minimum wages, job training programs, subsidized student loans and most of our already threadbare social safety net. And that environment will have been purchased for a princely sum by those who have profited so handsomely from America’s spiraling income inequality.
6 My first single was Mull Of Kintyre.
Also, be on the look out, as I'll be adding new items shortly!
Friday (and the big second weekend) started off with a couple of shorts programs. First up, Acting the Part, a selection of shorts showcasing the nature of who we pretend to be and who we really are. Here's the rundown:
Finally don't forget to buy your garlic, I have ordered Lautrec Wight and Sicilian Red, both are Autumn planting and should store well. I love knowing that even on the coldest and darkest days there is something slowly growing beneath the soil.
The pearly white nail shade featured on some models was created for the runway show. I wish I could find a more detailed shot. Did I detect an aurora borealis vibe?
Examples of various ways to use ‘Talk’ include:
xoxo from a wintry Hilltop..
hands on the side
wouldn’t
put all ingredients except for the water into a blender or food processor or use a stick blender (i use a bamix) and process until smooth adding filtered water if necessary to achieve the consistency desired..scoop into a bowl and eat immediately while it's still frozen..
TO RETURN
Nicole shrugged, but her cheeks turned pink. “He was invited.”
He is always doing whatever it takes to get a woman. That is really not attractive to most women, although many women will *say* it’s amazing to see a man do this to win a woman over. First thing that is never established is if the woman is even interested. Or the woman is clearly not interested in the beginning, and then the guy starts doing any and everything to make himself appealing to her and *SUDDENLY* she falls in love with him? HA!
9. Do Something. Now. You can put this work off, but delay will inevitably bite you and the survivability of your data. This isn’t a question or supposition but rather is a statement of fact. The preparation will take a few hours work and ongoing tweaks and updates, but the investment in time and effort will pay remarkable dividends. Don’t let your extremely valuable genealogical work be lost.
Appetizers consisted of salad options and chilled seafood. The seafood pieces (crab halves, oysters, mussels) were almost always half empty. And they weren’t even arranged, not like what you see in SukeyWasHere’s blog. Though we came to dinner just a little past 6PM, it already looked like the salad ingredients were leftovers from lunch, not freshly prepared.
The only downside was our waitress. She was not very experienced (she'd worked there for a month--we asked) but it was more than just not knowing the menu well. She rested her knee on my booth bench as she took our order, failed to bring drink refills, acted put out when we told her we needed ketchup and then still forgot to bring it to the table. She never once smiled or made us feel as if we were valued customers.
If you can count on one hand five good friends, then you are lucky.
Arrowhead Water $2.98
(no spaces). If you have a Facebook account and are a fan of Sparkle Creations Rubber Stamps, you can also upload there. Deadline for challenge #78 is Sunday, May 6th @ 9 PM PST.
The reason I’m thinking about how broken I am is because I watched a movie today called “A Walk to Remember.” There’s a teenager in the movie who lives a devout, sincere life. She knows she is loved and is confident in herself in a way that I haven’t been since my very young days, when I was a real toot (in a good way). The character is also confident in God.
Everything was very good and we enjoyed our meal a great deal. It was made even better by the ‘doggie boxes’ that we were able to bring home. The meal was also made memorable by the strawberry cobbler we had for dessert.
My Thoughts: Let me start this review by saying that I am white. I am blond, blue eyed Swedish Irish American. All that is needed for me to turn a lovely lobster red is for me to THINK about the sun. The reality that faced W.E.B DuBois is probably as far from any reality I will ever come, yet this book spoke to me. It spoke loudly. I found myself agreeing with what was written. I made notes in the margin. I made exclamation marks. I could fully understand the reality he was describing. To me that is the mark of a great book.
Being a human being, at least under Zuma’s watch, is going to be challenging. For a start, if you are a child who is lazy to go to school, you will be “taught by force” until you get your degree.
The Wife’s filet, ordered medium rare, came served over the hash with a side of green beans. The steak was not fork tender, but split easily with a knife. She didn’t tall much during dinner, so I’ll take that as an approval. The everything crusted rare tuna came featured four medallions of tuna served over an apple wasabi puree. The tuna featured a thin pink ring to show how much it was cooked, but was otherwise beet red. The crust resembled an everything bagel, with black and white sesame seeds, ginger and garlic. The crunch of the crust provided a nice complement to the tuna and its flavor did not overpower the fish. The accompanying slaw was a nice mix of napa cabbage, carrots and a sweet ginger dressing.
It was a difficult week
One area that every teacher needs to organize is their parent-teacher communication files. Some keep a log, a notebook, a file. I like to use a notebook, but have been toying with different ideas. Today's FREEBIE is a packet of parent-teacher communication printables.
strictly forbidden in her licensing agreements with the vampire council. And
So what can we infer from the migration patterns? There are many reasons why people move. Some people move because of a new job, to be closer to family, or just because they wanted a bigger home. In all regions of the U.S., the need for a larger home or apartment was one of the top three reasons for relocating and to establish their own household was also list near the top.
So we need matching towels, more than 4 cereal bowls, and matching dinner plates without chunks of ceramic missing around the edges. (I honestly hadn’t noticed the crappy condition of many of our kitchen basics before this whole thinking about a registry business.) Beyond those ideas, I was having trouble coming up with things to add to the list without going cupboard to cupboard to see what we should replace. I decided to look and see what the internet had to offer in the way of bridal registry checklists. Great googley moogley, what have I gotten myself into?
When I was trying on wedding dresses, the number one thing I'd hear people say, about me or anyone else in a big white dress was: "You look like a princess!". So, I wondered, what does a princess look like these days anyway? I collected a bunch of images of princesses, duchesses, and the like just in case any of you are also curious. If you are a princess and you happen to be missing from this post but would like to be included, send me an email with some wedding photos, I'll make it happen.
Have you come across, or written, a great health and nutrition article lately? Be sure to leave the link in the comments section so we can all read it.
‘Cause my world revolves around you it’s so hard for me to breathe–my world/our family’s world did revolve around finding you. Not anymore. You have shut us out. And once again, I am left to revolve and to breathe without you/knowing you in my life.
Paramore came on at 20:45 and it was quite a surreal experience for me since I have been listening to them non-stop for the last year. Every song was familiar but what was even more surprising was how many of the Polish fans knew all of the words. That is some dedication. Hayley was really energetic and she really rocked when doing the heavier stuff. Aga recorded everything on her mobile so I might have to go back to that to get a really considered view of the performance.
Knowing how to alter your sleep issues can help you to feel more refreshed and effective during the day. Whether you choose to purchase nylon nightgowns, adjust the thermostat, or focus on a schedule you can improve your sleep quality simply and effectively.
I have to say one of the things that really annoys me is the fact that the design team is now on the customer service case. Don't get me wrong, but I love the DT. They are great bunch of ladies with lots of inspiration. But they are the DT. They should never be more or less. If PTI has CS issues, then they should be hiring more people fit for the job. Why is it that the DT is relaying information from the forum in the first place. Why are people getting answers on the forum and not over CS emails that is dedicated for the job? I can only speculate that the DT was brought back in to add a bit more positive vibe to the forum (when they all suddenly show up on the forum, it's kind of obvious something happened behind the scenes). In truth, I just find it all very superficial. And btw, don't you also think that having the DT on the forums answering CS questions has turned the forum into another CS desk? What's with that?
* 6000 volunteers
It's scary though for the grown ups. In France very few houses have carpets. We have rugs, but as anyone raising a child knows, babies move far more quickly than they should be able to, and reach the side of the rugs far too soon, meaning they have to learn to walk on tiled floors.
From the bottom of my heart I wish you a joyful Easter!
09 Groovin' High (Gillespie) 2:59
This is what the magazine Charisma has recorded:
For future reference, when someone describes writing that way it’s probably book porn.
It didn’t take Katherine’s new publisher Templar very long to find out about me. I suppose an author’s muse is quite important, since without muses where would our poor human authors be? They would just be writing their old stories over and over again… which is only good if their last story happens to be something like Harry Potter.
7 Business Standard’s editorial, that the ruckus over FDI in retail signals that the political class in India is anti-reform. The political drama over the opening up of the retail sector to foreign investment is significant, not on account of whatever might happen to the immediate issue, but for what it says about the prospects of any kind of economic reform. In and of itself, the opening up of the retail sector is not hugely important, except as a signal that the government is still capable of taking decisions. The real message is that it has become impossible to reform India. If an innocuous decision on retail creates near-unanimous opposition, including from members of the ruling alliance and important people in the Congress itself, what prospects can there possibly be for labour reform, or cutting out the waste in all the government boondoggles dished out in the name of poverty alleviation? The larger message is that India’s political class has no time for economic reform, and no understanding of the need for it in an uncertain world where China becomes more powerful day by day on the strength of its superior economic performance.
By participating in Austin Twestival which supports charity: water, you can affect a change. This non profit organization is working with international partners including A Glimmer of Hope and Water for People to bring clean, safe drinking water to people in developing nations. 100% of the money raised goes to direct project costs, funding sustainable clean water solutions in areas of greatest need. Just $20 can give one person in a developing nation clean water for 20 years.
Please wish me luck!! I have all fingers & toes crossed!!
“I took up pole dancing. My stage name was Ginger. I was a sensation.”
Agar-agar is a product of gelatinous seaweed and it is available in dried form. For health reason, instead of using artificial colouring, I used the juice from a red dragon fruit (pitaya). The final colour of my agar-agar jelly is deep pink. Actually it looks quite nice and tasty!
Everyone’s combined efforts paid off, and by the day before the conversation, nearly all the seats in the auditorium had been booked—it would be a full house.
The woman sitting across from her looked more like a farmer than anything else. Her work clothes bore grass stains, and her fingernails were caked with dirt. Her short, white hair peeked out from under a crumpled men's hat. The only thing remotely witchy about her was that even though the wrinkles on her face put her at least at seventy, she seemed strong and didn’t stoop the way most old people did.
Here's wishing you a sunshiney and happy day!
Nearly 80 percent of disease in developing countries is linked to bad water and sanitation. Now a scientist at Michigan Technological University has developed a simple, cheap way to make water safe to drink, even if it is muddy.
So I guess this list constitutes my New Year's resolutions. I'm copying them down and we'll see how I'll do. Maybe some of these look good to you. Go ahead. Give them a try. And tell me yours. I'll see if any of your seem to be a good fit for me.
Gosh, I hope that title wasn't misleading! The room I am referring to is my craft room, but it is so much more. It's very little, only 9 X 12, but it packs-a-punch. I have a lot of interests, so I've divided the room into zones. Because of the size, it's also very difficult to get a good over-view of how it looks, but I've included several photos.
“Then it doesn’t matter which way you walk” said the Cheshire Cat.
osmotherley? pass. next please.
Got to the lake, finally... great views out there. Got the misting system done today. I had to paint the pipes and the valve that I put in, but I got to do it on a raft on the side of the boat house. I like marine plumbing more than I had imagined. That paint won't last 6 months, but it was worth it.
the world is paper thin ever since you've been gone.
1 london
pinned to my fingers,
If you forget my mind will stop.
I’m going to talk about something a bit more serious than my recent posts. Something very controversial, especially in the church. Something that people tip-toe on egg shells around.
The ornament balls (silver ones) were leftovers from what I've used on our Christmas tree and I just added few coloured balls to give it some pop. The pine cones were from a gift that we received from a church friend and the tinsel was from the dollar shop. The ribbon was from a previous sale and I'm so glad how it complemented my wreath. I made the bow myself. :)
The performance of Kira Kira aka Kristín Björk Kristjánsdóttir did not need the visuals in the background.
To my ear and eye, calling today “Holy” makes more sense that calling it “Good”.
My total stats: 989 beers, including 310 unique beers. Hmm, I think I see where my daughters' college fund has been going.
I stamped and embossed the Christmas Tree stamp from Michael Strong on green card stock with white ink from Martha Stewart line, and white embossing powder from Ranger products. I mounted that onto white card stock, which I mounted those onto a red velvet card stock. I stamped/embossed Merry Christmas, stamp from Plaid, with white ink & embossing powder onto the red velvet card stock. I placed a piece of ribbon, from American crafts, between the tree and word stamping.
Now the Passover of the Jews was near, and many went up from the country to Jerusalem before Passover to purify themselves.
This was something that I struggled with for a while. The idea that what we go through in life is to draw us closer to Christ was running through my head. This is when my eyes began to open and I began to realize how much I had been putting money on a pedistol. I had been keeping my money to myself and not giving it to God. In this area of my life, I was not allowing God to be in control. It was scary to realize, embarrassing, and breath taking. I have told so many people to not worry, God will provide, but I myself was not living like that. I was saying that, because it was an area in my life that was not prevelent. Oh boy, was I wrong, My eyes were open so WIDE!
***Hollie***
And we can’t move on
Prefab Sprout 'Lions In My Own Garden (Exit Someone)' (1982)
6. Marriage is a 24/7/365 commitment. There are no breaks or downtime.
This week the vast majority of Christians in the world will be reminded of the genealogy of Mary and Jesus. Both the Western Church and the Eastern Church recognize the Blessed Virgin's Conception, on the 8th and 9th, respectively. Most in the protestant tradition, heirs of the reformation, will not even notice. There may rise some reactions here and there to the Catholic understanding of the Immaculate Conception or how any emphasis on Mary may sidetrack us from Christmas. Otherwise, these are days like any other.
it is amazing how rapidly the spring season soared by.
In that same year in Tulsa a seventeen year-old was charged with the killing of a homeless man after repeatedly hitting him with a rock. The fifty-two year-old homeless man suffered a crushed skull from the multiple blows. It was reported that the attack was unprovoked.
According to the affidavit, Whaley told detectives he had gotten into an argument with his grandmother and his aunt the day before while he was in Daytona Beach. He decided then that when he returned home he would kill them both, the report states.
Must have been a marvellous affair. Now do remember to cross those ankles neatly!
While chicken is cooking boil the eggs. I do this by placing the eggs in a pot, covering with cold water and bringing to a boil. I boil for 1 min and then cover the pot and remove from heat. I let sit in the hot water for 17 mins then immediately place into a bowl of ice water and let cool completely.
Entwined by Heather Dixon - So cute! And surprisingly nail biting! I loved it!
RUSSIAN RELUCTANCE
Rav Avraham Isaak HaKohen Kook was born in Russian Griva (today Daugavpils in Latvia) in 1865. Born to a Litvik father, it would seem normal that R. Kook himself would become follower of the Litvik movement, but having a grandfather, on his mother’s side, who was from one of the Hassidic dynasties, the Kapust, it is not weird to consider his way and embracement of the Hassidic ways. He did spend some times in a Litvik yeshivah, the same his father had studied in, but stopped there after one and a half year to continue his studies elsewhere. He got his first position as Rabbi when he was 23, in Zaumel (today Zeimelis) in Lithuania. In 1904 he moved to Jaffa (in today’s Israel) to become rabbi there, where he engaged in ‘kiruv,’ outreach for Jews to bring them closer to Torah.
3 limits
Boston Beer Company (Samuel Adams) Samuel Adams Blackberry Witbier
3 Factors to Consider Before Getting Any Ice O Matic Ice Machine
Time goes so fast it's hard to believe That just yesterday you were home with me.
For me, Monday brings a fresh start, a new beginning, a clean slate. It's the day I need to remind myself to take a deep breath, both literally and figuratively, define or re-define my priorities, adjust and clarify my mission (or just re-focus on my mission) and determine my strategies for getting done what needs to be done over the course of the next seven days.
Sacred Gin – 40%
Big Brother is watching you. The eye in the sky never flinches and it never blinks.
Want to review it,
I applaud Mr. Palau for sharing his story with readers. He did not skim over parts. He just laid it all on the table. This made him more relatable to people. I think that by reading this book, Mr. Palau shows that there is still hope for people who have lost their way and need help from God to find their way back. Although, as much as I liked this book. I also did not have a hard time putting it down for a bit and than coming back to it. Mr. Palau never really preaches in this book. He just shares his story with some Bible scripture references. This book is worth your time.
I am sending you this message to clear up any misunderstanding about my former position at Jones Harvest Publishing. A number of authors recently contacted me and stated they were being informed by the Jones Harvest staff that I was on a “leave of absence.” This is absolutely UNTRUE. I have left Jones Harvest due to my own conscience about their business practices which I refused to be part of any longer due to the distressing information that I became aware of in recent months.
William Henry, 49, New York, N.Y.
Leave a 6 inch "tail" at the end of casting on stitches
John was delighted with my gift to him. For all his culinary threats, he had never actually tasted haggis before. So now he has. As have I. It’s basically Scottish scrapple. He loves it. I am happy for him.
"How about... a drooling moose?"
alike, every sphere is opaque to the others which surround it. . . . In
Did I mention Pat is one of our dogs? Not even the dog that was my baby before Brent - she's just one of our outside dogs. She is sweet, and a big lap dog, and I do love her, but where he is getting the idea that she is my favorite is beyond my understanding. Matt and I both have tried to explain that you can love more than one person...and animal...but Brent will not be deterred from the fact that I do not love him, or anyone, other than Pat. Is he seriously old enough to do this crap to bug me on purpose? I can't imagine anything we could have said or done that would make him think anything other than I love him and Matt!
Got that? Paul's implication is that businesses that refuse their services in a racist manner will suffer or even fail, presumably because in our "postracial" society, most people will spend their money at businesses that don't practice racial discrimination, because most (white) people aren't racists anymore. The free market is sacrosanct and magical, you see; if the dastardly liberals who supposedly control everything would just let market practices be "free," all problems would be solved. Including racism!
The moment seemed to drag on forever. Peter was experiencing pain far beyond anything he felt on the walk to the valley. He half formed the word “yes” when he remembered the vision of the woman. He could almost see her rising slowly toward the clouds. He looked at ground trying to buy himself time before answering. The emptiness inside him was winning, the “yes” once again climbed up his throat, when out of nowhere, the ground began to glow blue. It looked exactly as it did when the woman departed him. The others did not see it; it was for Peter’s eyes alone. He stammered, “No, I shall drink the chalice my Father gives me.”
“You know… What’s your ..*pause for effect*.. “number“? Again, the finger quotes, and this time he added the pervy eyebrow wagging when he said “number”.
UPDATE at 2:20 p.m. CST: She got through the surgery just fine. I received a texted pic of her from our older sister a few minutes ago, and she looks sooo diiffferent! I think that doctor took her down to an A cup, yo! :D Amazing. So happy for her. I'll update with pics just as soon as she sends me some that she says are ok to post. Hopefully next wek sometime. WOOHOO!
I don’t see the Angels anymore. I know they were real, though, and I know they’re still out there. I dream of them, still, and I haven’t seen my uncle Michael since I started living with my other uncle. No one seems to understand anymore. They moved me to homeschooling in year five, because the teachers thought there was something wrong with me, and the other kids laughed at me, both because I talked about the Angels. I’m not really that good at making friends, anyways, and I don’t know if I’ll ever really have any other than the Angels.
I'm losing my pride and I'm tasting bile.
Iceland's thousand years, Iceland's thousand years,
Some music started to play. With my ears still blocked it sounded very distant and faint. The music sounded like something from an old European porn film; melodic, heavy on strings and piano, with a female voice ‘moaning’ in time with the tune. At the same time I became aware of other voices in the room, male, speaking too softly to make out what they were saying. The strange thing was that these voices didn’t seem to be coming from quite the same direction as the music. Had he turned the radio on? Or the TV? Or… The thought hit me like a bolt of lightning, was there somebody else in the room?
This blog post is unashamedly about CAMRA.
While in the Courtyard Garden, my Gardenia augusta is also blooming for the first time. The Spathiphyllum and Duranta 'Geisha Girl' make a great pair, and the vibrant colours of the Salvia splendens and Crossandras make a wonderful contrast with the soft and delicate purple of the Cleome spinosa 'Senorita Rosalita'.
Valentine Hamper Menu:
“I know the story. Edmond Dantès was wrongly imprisoned by a magistrate who threw him into a prison where innocent people were forgotten by the outside world.”
IP: The council can’t do anything about the utilities. How would you say you’re free to be different? What’s a blue sky question? (Ian, as far as I remember, said the last question thoughtfully, as if he were considering his answer, and OWD gave him a moment and then directed the question on to CR.)
Someone bought me a drink and I started talking about my agonizing trip, saying something like, "Oh, man, it was horrible, I was on the train for 18 hours in a raging blizzard," and so on. Some other people join us and I get handed another beer, and I have to retell the story for the newcomers: "Yeah, man, I was on the train for 20 hours and I didn't think I'd ever get here," et cetera. Another beer and suddenly my ride lasted 21 hours. By this time I was feeling pretty good and it showed, if you know what I mean. The impromptu party soon retired upstairs where this one guy broke out a cooler of beer, and of course, I had another one and my trip was now up to 22 hours, and so on and so on all through the night! I don't recall how conscious I was of my ever-expanding fish tale; I don't think I was deliberately exaggerating in order to get more beer, but I might have. Regardless, it was just what I needed, so I didn't care.
Let all things go as I please—I will weave songs, weave them wherever I go, with the flowers that grow along my path; but put me in a desert, where there are no flowers, and how will I weave a chorus of praise to God? How will I make a crown for him? Let this voice be free, and this body be full of health, and I can sing God’s praise; but stop this tongue, lay me on the bed of suffering, and it is not so easy to sing from the bed, and chant high praises in the fires…confine me, chain my spirit, clip my wings, make me very sad, so that I become old like the eagle—ah! Then it is hard to sing.”
Don Gutteridge taught English at the Faculty of Education, University of Western Ontario, before starting the Marc Edwards mystery series.
These are not men who balk at violence either. These are men to whom other men are but pawns.
Day 3 in our Bible study homework was especially interesting to me. I am a teacher. I have taught high schoolers for 12 years now, and believe me- I don’t take the task lightly! I fully realize the power I have to harm or uplift. There have been many days where I have sought forgiveness for something I had said or done- forgiveness from God and from my students! It is an awesome responsibility. James’ words are very real to me.
Ayase: Asuka in a wheelchair without character development. Also fanservice.
We thought they had died out
2010-05-18
* 4 chicken breasts, cooked & shredded
Some issues are so compressed as to require footnotes. Smith writes:
On my actual birthday we drove around Slo county and went to play by the ocean in some tide pools like little kids. I did something I used to do when I was 6 on my 21st birthday, which I think is fantastic. I'm not really and have never been a "party girl" so I think it was a cute day overall. My mom and friends did a lot for me all which I really appreciate. Again, how did I get so lucky to have these wonderful people love me?!
“The lady simply no longer had any hope of Poldi turning up again.”
The successful delivery of nonuplets would be one of the highest multiple births ever recorded.
9:49 PM – With Beth Phoenix at the commentary table, Kelly Kelly and Layla will take on Natalya and Maxine. Michael Cole takes the time to announce that Beth will face Layla for the Diva’s Championship at Over the Limit. After a quick match, Layla gets the win for her team.
The whole circumstance made me think about an article I read on MSN a few weeks back. It was about how fewer and fewer men are choosing to wear their wedding bands and about how fewer and fewer women are concerned about it. I can’t imagine my husband not wearing a wedding band and I was very happy to see him so concerned about the same thing. The article continued about how wedding rings are an oudated custom and simply not relevant in today’s society. Oh really? Wearing a symbol of your commitment to each other is “simply not relevant?” Why not?
Your child doesn't always know how explain it exactly, but his "throwing a tantrum" is his attempt to alert you that he needs something. It is not a malicious attempt to embarrass you or manipulate you. It's up to you to help figure out what the need is. Is he hungry? Tired? Overwhelmed? Does he need to go to the bathroom? Does he just need a hug or some of your undivided attention? Are you asking him to do something unreasonable?
2 tablespoons garlic, chopped
MY MOM!
Great smell. Deep roasted and coffee flavors. Website says "aggressive bitterness," but at 60 IBU the bitterness isn't so aggressive in a RIS. That's OK too, I hate Victory beers and overly hopped styles remind me of them. This one is just right though. Despite the 10.4% ABV, the alcohol is virtually imperceptible. Perfect.
OMG, tomorrow morning heading to the International airport of Helsinki-Vantaa, final destination LONDON.
This seminar series is a must have if it’s been years since you reviewed channel theory. It starts with a gradual review of the history of Ryodoraku acupuncture and progresses to an intermediate discussion of meridians and the science behind the AcuGraph. I highly recommend having this series in your library for you and your staff!
Ana and her husband moved to Los Angeles five years ago when the TV industry came calling back. They thought they had escaped it all when they moved to Playa del Carmen in México to act as irresponsible beach bums, but the offer was too tempting to pass up. Three years ago, they joyously welcomed their daughter into their bilingual and bicultural family. These days, Ana Lilian is splitting her time as a brand consultant building bridges with Latina bloggers, a freelance writer and TV producer, and dedicating precious time to her labor-of-love blog for parents raising bilingual and bicultural children: SpanglishBaby .
Falling Rock - Though the competition has increased significantly in recent years, Falling Rock is still probably Colorado best beer bar. I've had mixed experiences with their food, their pricing is not posted anywhere and seems to vary every time I go, and their service typically leaves something to be desired. But Chris Black has built the best beer selection in the state and its not even close. They are the place that got the first Pliny the Younger keg when Russian River started distributing beer in Colorado. They are the place that has half the Fantome Saison collection just sitting in a fridge waiting for you. They actually have Isabelle Proximus listed on their beer menu. And Falling Rock during the GABF? Forget about it. They park a refrigerated semi out front because they can't fit all the specialty kegs inside.
It's only after everyone else has gone that a distinguished older gentleman reveals himself to be the crash-landed Martian... he has a third arm hidden under his coat!
Alcohol By Volume : 4.20%
If you are my Facebook Friend then you might have seen my Profile Pic for September 2011. What, you are not a FBF? Please join me on Facebook.
Best feature I’m looking forward to is Siri. I’ve heard that you can rename the assistant. So I’ve been brainstorming on a new name. Here’s what I’ve got so far:
I look forward to getting emails from you ladies and we can go from there.
Nina is uneasy around men and wary of her mother (always outside the door). She has no-one (her father is never mentioned) apart from Lily, whose uninhibited frankness disturbs her and excites her. The opportunity for rare friendship becomes mixed with nascent and bottled-up sexual feelings (sex is not the kernel of the film but one of the many aspects of Nina's slow-burning maturation/mutation). Something strong is growing out of her brittleness. The wicked rapture on her face as the feathers sprout is something else.
Though these fair captives taste reprieve,
Prepare a medium hot grill. Grill the vegetables on each side until the slices are tender, but take care not to overcook. Remove from grill, carefully arrange on a platter, and sprinkle with a pinch of red pepper flakes. Arrange grilled vegetables on a platter or plates. Just before serving, slightly drizzle with lemon juice, strew with chopped olives, add a few goat cheese crumbles or a grating of parm, and scatter your herb of choice over the grilled fare.
- Pike press to Push up
Rohit Bal’s Grand Finale show opened with Silver Strings – a spirited trio of beautiful ladies, who enthralled the audience with their virtuosity on the violins. As the lights came on, the five cones rose to reveal statuesque models in diaphanous creations, while the melodious music of the live orchestra above the stage provided haunting melodies during the show.
Patterned Paper: Heidi Grace 'Girlfriend' PPs
Luckily, I didn’t have to go into work until 10 am. Those are some nice hours right there, eh? Going in for 10 am, leaving shortly before 1. You won’t hear me complain, especially because I get paid for 4 hours anyway.
(3) Authors in biblical times were not as infatuated with “literal facts” as modern authors tend to be. They frequently wove together history and allegory or history and myth to make a point. Ezekiel 19 is one case in point. The author tells literal history, but he does it by using symbolism. The end result is a story which has a literal point and must, as history, be taken seriously, but which can’t be understood literally at every point. The idea that the Bible must be 100% inspired is a very recent, and quite misguided notion.
I should tip my hat the producers for at least not giving us what was expected – a full-on beach episode that’s all fanservice and little or no peril, where the major conflict is who has the sexiest swimsuit. That can be left to throwaway OVAs, or even better, DeviantArt. In fact, the cast is pared down to just Izumo, Renzou (pinkie), and Rin, with his new familiar Kuro (who sort of comes in handy). This gives these three characters more time to gel, but unfortunately the main character of this episode is neither of them.
I got this chance because my cousin is working on a big project with them, and he took me to take some photos, I shot more than 400 times and the subjects were different, animals, the life in the coffee area, portraits, coffee fields, how the everyday life for these people is like and so on.
So, I actually got this video to upload! Woohoo for blogger! This is Captain America swearing in as an Officer. SO cool! I have another on of him graduating, but that will have to wait till tomorrow :) Isn't he handsome :)
Now I'm online again.
14. Why are the pickles pink?
A few months back, I posted this blog post about a different inflatable car seat. After posting, I received a comment from The Car Seat Lady, and she left me some very informative information. After reviewing her information, I learned that I had made a poor choice in car seats for my sweet kids. I'm very grateful to have been properly informed and I was able to switch to a much safer, easier car seat.
The accent fabrics are all prints I found locally. I will be using cotton batting & backing the quilt with Michael Miller's Huevos in gray (once it arrives in the mail). I also plan to use the scrap accent fabric to make my own bias binding.
Finally, governments throughout history have used fear as a means of control. The more fearful a population is, the more likely they are to turn to Uncle Gummint to coddle and protect them, even though the security is completely illusional, and in most cases the fear is generated by the self-same organizations to stampede the cattle to the velvet corrals. Hyping natural disasters, ‘terrorist’ bombs and asteroid impacts serves the greater purpose of destabilizing people so that they surrender their rational and normal instinct to protect themselves, in favor of surrendering their lives to a control structure, which fosters victimhood and illusory safety in excchange for fealty.
With respect, tact, grace and magnanimity
Pray to God, tell him your worries. Ask him to show you what He wants you to do with your life. If it is not the life plan you are wanting, it is my personal belief (meaning you don’t have to believe this because it’s an opinion) that God will nudge you from that path onto the one He wants for you. It may not be the most prestigious job, it may not have the highest salary, it may not even be the job your parents want you to have, but ultimately He will provide for you and keep you safe if you listen to Him and follow his commands.
As always, anyone with a relevant opinion is welcome to participate in our brunch. Simply enter your response in the form of a comment below. At the end of the weekend, I will post an edited summary of our conversation.
In this love-it-or-loathe-it TV spot, a woman in a neck-brace walks gingerly home while a voice over tells us she suffers from a case of BWVAKTBOOM – Boyfriend Went Vegan And Knocked The Bottom Out Of Me. Watch the video and then let’s talk…
Attributes: Agility-d8, Smarts-d6(A), Spirit-d8, Strength-d10, Vigor-d12
Bring on November!
I have been waiting for the weekend to do this challenge... since it took me FOREVER to complete! My closet was a complete mess. I am truly embarassed to show you these before pictures.
This is a real slice of brewing history in a glass, worth trying for that reason alone.
This policy is valid from 3 August 2010
Citizen watches are made by a company that was started in 1918. The company was originally called Citizen, but soon afterwards changed its name to Citizen Watch Company. It now trades as Citizen Holdings Co., Ltd and is based in Tokyo, Japan. It is also one of the largest watch producers in the world. Citizen watches are well known for their high quality products and their enviable reputation is firmly built on this.
Turn off your lights and position your face a few inches from your computer screen. Begin playing the video and then shut your eyes. Interesting effects, patterns and colors should start appearing.
Blessed are the flockmarked trees and bees made gold.
“Anybody have anything they’d like to share?” he asked.
Does the name Pavlov ring any bells?
I'd have stopped reading at this point.
Safe and Effective African Mango plays a role in the metabolism of glucose, and is necessary for energy production. It helps to even out blood sugar levels and can be positive both for people with diabetes and hypoglycemia. It is also critical to the synthesis of cholesterol, fats, and proteins.
My back to the wall, still not making eye contact, I slid down to the floor next to the door. There wasn't much room to sit or play anywhere else. There were no toys. Just babies.
I do wonder at times whether the completely ineffectual response to illegal immigrants (or even law breaking legal ones) is quite deliberate, not necessarily by the politicians themselves, but by various government departments with some sort of axe to grind against the government or the people of the UK who do not see immigration as being to the greater benefit of themselves or the nation. Devotees of the Frankfurt School spring to mind in this instance, it certainly fits their depraved attitudes towards promoting a "socialist utopia", an oxymoron if ever there were one.
I woke up at 11.15pm. The contractions were stronger now and I was having to breathe through them. They were still erratic though, varying from 6-8 minutes, never any shorter. My husband wanted to phone the midwives but I was sure it was too soon. We were lying in bed, me on all fours, breathing into the pillow each time a contraction came. I held my husbands' hand. He stroked my back. Then I cried. I remember thinking "I've got hours to go, how can I do this?" (ummmm, hello transition!). It hurt but the gap between contractions made it OK. My first labour had been ten hours of unrelenting back labour, with wave upon wave of contractions. This was so different.
No Black Crowes, but Dolly Parton and REM. Weird.
Was asked spontaneously if I could cover a live gig from Kid Kenobi and Mc Shureshock at the Karratha All Seasons yesterday and was stocked to see a nice little club with an awesome atmosphere up here in Karratha….
“He is obviously not in a position to run the IMF,” Tim told an eager press corps. I have to agree with him, but the statement of fact has been made reality entirely due to the actions of the NYPD and the local justice system. A more accurate summary of the situation would’ve been “We have put him in a position from which he can’t run the IMF”.
rebirth
The new Weekly Candy is:
I learned lots of interesting things. Vallauris is on the côte d'Azur in the Alpes-Maritimes. The recorded history for the area talks about the ceramics trade as early as 1500.
We continue our theme this month on Leadership. Last year I was asked to serve as a consultant for a financial management company. When they initially contacted me they provided very little information on what they actually needed help with. All I was told was that they needed to talk to me very soon. When I arrived, I sat down with a group of eight very emotional executives. They explained to me how their companies IT department had been engaged in unethical business practices. My first question was “How does everyone feel right now?” They each expressed their emotions – anger, fear, and betrayal. The CEO explained they he has been playing golf with the CIO for four years. The CEO never imagined the CIO or even a department in his company would ever engage in any unethical activities. This situation was a serious test of this organizations leadership.
The violence, which, I can't stand under any circumstances.
3. We talk a lot about how ebooks are revolutionisng everything from publishing to the way we make marmite, it seems. But we are also seeing a rebirth in high quality handmade books go hand in hand with that. Here's one:
UMNO/BN has been holding events/ceramah while promising voters that if they are return to power, they will honour all their promises. At the same time UMNO/BN claims that they are the "tested" lot, since they were the government since Independence.
As Jesus, spoke life into creation at the beginning of the world so here He speaks to creation again.
Open your eyes, then, and see the world anew, shining, sparkling with this grey and misty morning.
Sorry its taken me so long to post about Saturday!
Preparing this post has been quite an emotional experience. And not only for the passionate music, but also for the memories of a trio of friends that have now gone. With the death of Zani Diabaté none of the men, who met at the Ballet National du Mali and who subsequently decided to 'do their own thing' on the side by starting the now legendary Super Djata Band, remains alive. Alou Fané, singer and dancer, master of the kamalen n'goni, proud member of a blacksmith family and a unique personality, was the first to go, over fifteen years ago now. A loss felt to this day. A few years ago saw the death of Daouda 'Flani' Sangaré, musical researcher, extraordinary singer, terrific dancer, sought-after romantic (very popular with the ladies), but also a man who had experienced the deepest depths of misery - after losing his parents at a young age and then (in the last decade) his second and finally his first wife -, and a warm and caring friend. And now Zani, the first and last with the Ballet, who besides a spectacular and unique guitarist was a dancer, multi-instrumentalist (with a background in djembe and other percussion instruments), bandleader and organiser, driving force, as well as being a (in my opinion: too) modest and very friendly guy.
2 KINGS 7:1-20
-Cena lifts Brock and slams him on the steps.
Ticklish on his thighs
2. You reach your last day without ever having experienced the natural power that inhabits you to do great work and achieve great things.
In other countries, things are a little different. My cousin who lives in the U.S. says everyone envies her brown skin because she doesn’t have to go sunbathing or go to expensive tanning salons just to have that sun-kissed glow. Then again, there are still racists in America, but thanks to the civil rights movement, these people are called out for their beliefs, and there is much discussion about this issue.
They are divided into tribes, of sorts. The refugees and immigrants have racist undercurrents all their own, but they are bonded by the commonalities of their experiences–past horrors, present confusions with American culture. I have cheerfully flung myself into this tribe, immersing myself into whatever the culture is of whatever apartment I am visiting: drinking chai and playing with babies with the Bhutanese, watching terrible TV and having loud conversations with Somalis. I love them, know most of them from years spent doing homework clubs, art classes, English classes. They know me, know my husband, know my baby. We chat on the elevators, on the playground, at the mailboxes.
The film proper ends with a haunting, stark shot of the porter slumped over in the restroom, totally broken and resigned to his fate. Murnau and Mayer wanted to end the film with the protagonist's sad death, completing their theme of a man crushed by his society's limiting ideas of a man's worth. The studio wanted a happier resolution, though, and Murnau and Mayer technically fulfill that mandate with a cynical, absurd epilogue that's practically dripping with sarcasm. It's even preceded by a title that explicitly identifies this ending as a deus ex machina, an intervention of the filmmakers with no relation to reality. In this ending, the porter is saved from his fate by an unlikely inheritance from a wealthy stranger, and he celebrates his good luck lavishly while doling out gifts to other unfortunate souls. The whole thing plays out as a ridiculous fantasy where it's entirely obvious that the director and writer have nothing but contempt for this addition to their art, and this tone winds up undermining the happy ending that the producers had wanted. In its very unreality, this epilogue simply reinforces the theme, since only an openly unrealistic miracle can save this sad man from what otherwise seemed an unavoidable and dismal fate.
Hiring a comedian also sends a message that life is about more than work, that there is time for play, too. A corporate comedian will deliver material that is respectful of the audience, relevant and clean. Magicians are also a good icebreaker for corporate entertainment. A magician brings the wonder of childhood to those attending; a sense that anything is possible. A good magician will help the audience put aside the stress and worry of everyday activity, and bring them to the realm of magic. Magicians also make us laugh, and see the ordinary with new eyes. By changing our point of view, a magician can inspire and motivate. Corporate magicians will lead the audience to a new way of seeing, and that attitude can carry over into the workplace.
Fold the binding at a 45 degree angle and begin sewing on the diagonal fold.
Believe.
One of the main wedding-oriented tasks we wanted to accomplish on our trip to Scotland was the making of this tartan. After much encouragement from American family and friends, I was surprised when the Scottish’s friends were the ones who thought it was a little unnecessary and over-the-top. I guess it makes sense, their culture doesn’t buy into the crazy, big weddings that we do on this side of the pond and while they are all so excited to come to the wedding, they are just being practical and I totally understand that.
Stamps: Heather Ellis- Pure Innocence
Life moves so fast. It’s ridiculous. But we need to learn the skills to be able to pause and think critically about the communities that we are a part of. We need to be able to healthily critique the way we think, talk, and live. Most of the time this means we need to be around others who do not think exactly like we do. That means we need diversity. We NEED others to show us our flaws. We NEED others to show us our faulty thinking. We need others to show us how we can better critique the communities that we are a part of. There is a danger of always being negative, but if we begin modeling the changes in our own lives, then we can think about how we are bringing growth to the community rather than constantly attacking it.
In the Canada store, Spoil is #1 in Historical Fantasy, and has been for over a week now. It's #30 there in ALL Science Fiction and Fantasy titles.
The other day I did a trial for a certain company, where it took THREE MONTHS!!! to reach the verdict = “you are not good enough”.
All at the rec seemed good. The receptionist answered all of her questions amicably, and the walkway Squidge stationed beyond the doors was functioning properly. Oftentimes in a polluted area the robotics were first to show signs of the psychic environ. Tina wasn't overly familiar with the first quadrant of Vonnegut's Four Corners, but the Squidge directed her uptown to section C where she would eventually merge with Conch on the reservoir. Over the years the big man made lake had grown into a full blown nature center complete with cloned Pacific coast greenery. City waste was pulverized, liquified and injected into a system of underground quarries, and exhaust vapors from the lake bed had dramatically changed the surface temperature in the immediate area. The big sequoias loomed like giants on their sinking islands. Tina hadn't been there for years, not since the family vacation when her brother broke his arm wrestling with an immature brown bear. The animal had been close to devouring his face when a ranger dispatched it with an impact pole. It was a good reminder that not every furry creature in this new world was people friendly.
The Lady or the Tiger: The Evolution of the Hublot Clef du Temps: "Now the Clef du Temps was a sort of act of horological subversiveness. Basically, you could make the watch run at either half or double speed, depending on whether you wanted to feel like time was running slowly or quickly (depending on, say, whether you were spending time with a sumptuously compelling member of the opposite sex, or going through an IRS audit.)"
All these years later, when it came time for me to send Clint Eastwood a photo to be signed as part of my autograph collecting hobby, I just had to choose one of him as Dirty Harry Callahan.
and run to Midnight on April 30th.
And yes, I am a complete anomaly on campus. Most of my classmates are far more conventional in their sartorial choices, and I do get my fair share of dirty looks and mockery.... but it's fine, as I'd feel much worse if I dressed in modern casual styles just to fit in. I can honestly say I've never in my life owned sweatpants (if you're wondering, I wore patterned leggings to gym class back in the day) and I'm not about to start. Now, I am not judging you lucky things who can pull that off, but in my own experience I've found dressing nicely helps me stay alert and focused in class, gives me some much-needed confidence when navigating the world, and shows my professors respect. (And then there's the part where I frankly don't care all that much for 21st century aesthetics, haha...)
So it could equally be said that people don’t vote for what you do, they vote for why you do it; what you do just proves what you believe.
Maybe it’s just me. I’d encourage you to check out the free lessons available if you’re interested in a music program for your child. The homeschool moms in my circle have always raved about how much they love KinderBach. Clearly, it just wasn’t for our family. If you’ve had experience with KinderBach, I’d love to know what you thought…
Zishaan ‘ZuZu’ Shafi
I'm so happy you drop by today! Thanks for your time!
weekend, and I also had the time to attend to a Thai Demo Cooking event that I enjoyed so much! Saturday Thai cooking Dinner and Sunday Greek Easter Feast!.. Thank God for all these lovely gatherings.
Once the wizard data is submitted the result can be either a failure or success.
As many of you know Just Jhoom! is my life – and I spend a lot of time – in fact most of my time working on it, teaching it, thinking about it….it really is all-consuming!
While last year’s inaugural fishing trip netted an almost instant success, the fish were more elusive last weekend. There were some bites, but everything that got hauled up was tiny. Not a single cod made the size limit. By the sound of the talk on the radio, we weren’t the only ones faring poorly. There were plenty of fish being caught, but there weren’t many being kept.
of the last row of hearts), Selections, Invert, Delete, Select None
'read'
Thursday night took us to the first day of the Bexley Beer Festival, so keen we were that we arrived twenty minutes before it opened. We were not alone, however, three young drinkers amongst a fellowship of retirees who clearly bought their Beer Fest T-shirts before they drank this much beer.
Such a methodology sounds like the makings of an excellent one shot. Several characters all of advanced years and abilities that may not know each other but do know the stakes in the latest game, all assembled together to protect something or someone.
What is your favorite social media channel?
The image I have used for my cards is
611 Anton Blvd. #1400
We’ve talked about TSTL heroines before and about kickass heroines and the characteristics that bother us about them. Today I want to talk about the powerful heroine, but it’s not a specific characteristic. As you know, a couple of weeks ago, I attended the RT Booklover’s Convention and one of my favorite workshops was a panel on contemporary romance.
Ah, well, it would seem Cornelis is Swedish for Bob Dylan if he Dylan never plugged in his guitar. Lots of blues and bluegrass and what I can only surmise are traditional Swedish and Dutch influences. Not bad but I think the life was bigger than the music.
_____I was looking to buy some new sneakers last night and the guy at the shoe store asked if he could interest me in some running shoes. I laughed until I threw up then left.
“Whip My Hair” – Stone Cold
Among the various alternatives were the following descriptions of an afterlife: (1) A life of peace and tranquility (POSTLF1) and (2) A life like the one here on earth, only better (POSTLF3). There was very little meaningful difference between liberals and conservatives regarding their views on the matter. With respect to the first variable, POSTLF1, eighty-five percent of liberals/extreme liberals thought it somewhat or very likely that an afterlife would be a life of peace and tranquility, while an even greater 95% of conservatives/extreme conservatives held similarly positive views of life after death. Regarding the second variable, POSTLF3, 57% of liberals/extreme liberals thought it somewhat or very likely that an afterlife would be better than life on earth, and 59% of conservatives/extreme conservatives reported it somewhat or very likely that an afterlife would be better than life on earth. Again, all percentages are rounded.
1 ¼ cup whole milk
If you ever get the chance to visit Stellenbosch, please make Middelvlei one of your stops. Be sure to book the Boerebraai and arrive with an empty belly, camera battery at full status and friends/family, you won't be disappointed.
I am happy with how it turned out! Stay tuned for a class featuring this technique coming in the near future!
The U.S. Embassy stand is quite impressive with its sleek white curves and changing colors via spotlights. It is simple, elegant and clean at the same time. There are several iPads in the lobby area with games and puzzles having to do with the U.S. And then a circular room with white poofs for the presentations.
Bardamu continues:
This is a great opportunity and we are truly thankful to The Artisan Group. If you get a chance check them out by clicking the icon below, they have some wonderful photos of celebrities wearing handmade items!
As soon as Israel’s war against Hezbollah in Lebanon began on July 12, it was clear that the conflict was going to be imprinted on the internet like no other. Citizens under bombardment on both sides posted photographs and wrote of their experiences. We described the phenomenon at the time and found ourselves addicted to Kishkushim ...
As regular readers know, I am a huge fan of vampires, and have accordingly decreed that the typical Arandish Vampire is much more powerful than the "standard" D&D vampire. I have little to add to my prior comments about the role vampires play in my D&D game, but I want to take this opportunity to explain which pop-cultural (and specifically, cinematic) vampires have been most influential to me.
- You have to trust that your children are capable people.
The trouble is, it's almost impossible to describe, without giving everything away. Here's the blurb:
disappearing
“I have my own business.” I kept it moving, but he responded.
Boom.
How - Sign up! Tell everyone that you are in the Frenzy. Get ready to start writing.
Random.Org picked 6 and I was comment number 6 replying to someone so I skipped me and Raven was next. Congratulations. Due to my week long Vacation I will send it out when I get back.
I think that young people today are very interested in the world around them and keen to make their own minds up about current, very real and very pressing issues. I believe that fiction can help to provide a route map through some of these issues. My advice to other writers would be to make sure you have a good story line and strong characters. Otherwise it is easy to fall into the trap of lecturing and no-one wants that when they settle down to a good read.
We’re just over 3 weeks way from this year’s Sundown Marathon and the guys at Maxifuel Singapore put together some interviews to get you going!
Romans 8:28 “And we know that in all things God works for the good of those who love him, who have been called according to his purpose.”
Old Olive satin ribbon (yes my absolute favorite ribbon) was used to embellish my card. I didn't have any blue rhinestones so I pulled out my copic markers and colored my clear ones and TA-DA blue rhinestones that match my NQN cardstock! Awesome right!!! I used some of my retired gold cord to attach the tag to the ribbon. To finish off I used some of my homemade shimmer spray made with the Gold shimmer paint for just the right amount of sparkle. I don't think you can see that in the picture though, which is a shame since it is so pretty!
~Peggysue
Health Benefits of Honey:
Artist Lynette Reed
stops for a moment half expecting snow to start falling and
There are 7 different border punches used in all. Manufacturers represented are Fiskars, EK Success and Martha Stewart. Inspiration for the bordered background came from a 12x12 layout I remember seeing in an issue of Creating Keepsakes a year or so ago. I thought a smaller scale would be a good place to try this out. I would give credit to the designer but I have no idea which issue it's even in. Sorry. It just stuck in my head.
To sum up, I really think this is an under-appreciated show. It doesn’t get the kind of exposure that Arashi’s shows get, but ranks up with VS Arashi as far as I’m concerned. As long as they’re doing musical segments, there’s no trouble following along without knowing Japanese – everything they do is pretty intuitive.
- Amazon - selling books I had read but were still in good condition - have sold arounf £4 worth, nothing much but then I haven't bought many books this year either...
7/11 Toronto, ON- Sony Center
Check out this photo…almost looks like something a jeweler created.
revolutionary Marxism, he hadn’t really changed. In the course of time, I discovered that his Open University correspondence studies had fallen victim to an epic post office strike which had lasted over four months and that this had resulted in his decision to begin his studies once more at UCD.
The characteristics of patterns they thought most important was that it can be explained (there is an idea or structure) and someone who understands it can extend it or fill in a missing piece.
-that leaving toys and laundry on the basement floor is a very bad thing
Going into my 3rd year of sobriety, I am finding with time passing, indeed it gets easier to not want that drink. Lately, I have heard the topic of how does one get through the upcoming holiday season to be one that really affects a person who is new to sobriety.
There's also a link to the 4/10/06 New York Times article I critiqued about some former residents who, thanks to FCR's one-time lifting of a gag order, were allowed to talk about how FCR mostly treated them nicely in efforts to relocate. AtlanticYards.com describes it: The New York Times takes a look at some of the people who live, or used to live, in the development's footprint and what the developer, Forest City Ratner Companies (FCRC), is doing to help ease the transition.
These cutie- pies are up for adoption from KittyKind, an animal rescue group based in NYC.
Also, even after engaging in this often lengthy and time-consuming process no one can guarantee success of any case because of the many factors over which the couple or the attorney have no control.
In any war story, but especially in a true one, it’s difficult to separate what happened from what seemed to happen. What seems to happen becomes its own happening and has to be told that way. The angles of vision are skewed. . . .In many cases a true war story cannot be believed. If you believe it, be skeptical. It’s a question of credibility. Often the crazy stuff is true and the normal stuff isn’t, because the normal stuff is necessary to make you believe the truly incredible craziness.
A lot of good episodes this week – many series that were disappointing last week had much better ones this week. Alas, with everything being 2-3 episodes in, the animation quality is starting to take a hit. Although that may just be Hyouka making everything else look like trash.
Well I hadn’t noticed but the people really noticed that they really didn’t want us around,
There is no dominant producer like an Antinori or Capezzano here though, just farmers scratching a living from the land. It must be hard to be ambitious for your wine here, but Leonardo Beconcini is just that. His family have farmed here for generations and in the early 1950s were among the very first to buy the land they had previously rented and ever since have had a growing emphasis on wine.
The AEC welcomes Riedwaan Davids back and hopes he will continue to fight with others in the community for land and housing!.
How it Works: Once you get on to their site, enter your zip code and specify what you’re looking for. You can choose to see your area’s daily deals or browse more specific categories like health and beauty, restaurants, shopping and so on. Click on your desired deal and you will be directed to a new window where you can follow the instructions to get your deal.
the wheels and leave my car up on bricks
Hugs and Loves
But this ring is accidental, and it’s exclusiveness is a by-product. This according to Aristotle is placed among the virtues, because this is friendship. What a great lesson. These children could be taught to enlarge their circle of friends, instead of giving them a guilt-trip about their view-point, which has not even fully developed.
To be with you
02 Somebody to Shove
There was one “expert” who was interviewed who believed this cloth was indeed the burial cloth of Jesus. But he also believed that the sightings of Jesus after His death and resurrection were actually just sightings of this burial cloth with the image of Jesus on it. This expert found it impossible to believe that Jesus was actually raised from the dead and was seen and touched by His disciples, but had no problem believing that these same disciples would mistake this piece of cloth for a living, breathing risen Christ.
I honestly have the best inlaws ever.
slot with a midwife in an hour - or see the ob/gyn that afternoon.
sea salt and cracked pepper
I looked down and realized what a mess I was in. The chain was still hanging around my neck and I was bare. I sneaked back in and found my clothes on the living room floor. I put it on hastily and tugged the chain a few times before it fell off. My neck was hurting much more than before. I was back at the door in an instant.
The only delay in making these is having to rest the dough; however, I made the dough Saturday night and finished the next morning before church with very little extra time required. I would definitely make this again and play around some with the filling. I decided to make the nutmeg cake for one of our (many) baby showers at work. I got really excited because I thought I would be all cute and take my new cake plate to display it.
ironing board, fold the remaining half of the binding so that it encases the raw edge. At this point, depending on the length of the seam, you may want to use a few pins to hold the folded over edge in place. You may not need to, however, because this stuff irons beautifully!
It was a nice little getaway.
trying to figure out if i was supposed to be on the left or the right side..
½ cup oil
What I did not appreciate was the two young men who walked out of Herbergers at 3:30 a.m. this morning with two arm loads of Columbia coats that they had not paid for. Why? It is odd how a thing like that can make you feel violated. You didn't do it. You told someone about it (well, my mom did) but they still got away with it, it has an odd way of making a person feel dirty.
And don't have any kids yourself.
"People's lives were affected in a strong way, and hopefully this'll help us raise awareness," he said. "It's not charity. It's community."
Hugs to all,
As April approached I started going out with a new friend, I hadn’t been ‘out’ since moving out of my home in Birmingham and it felt good to dress up and dance. One night she took me to a town centre pub where we played pool and got talking to some regulars in the pub. One guy seemed especially nice and we were getting along very well. When the pub closed we moved on to a club, it was a warm night so I offered to put the guy’s jacket in my bag so he didn’t have to wear it while we danced. In the club we bumped into his sister and spent a little while chatting with her. We were having a lot of fun. We danced a while and before we knew it the club was closing too.
1996 – The English Patient
songs playin about drugs and alcohol and love and war
Once I get everything done for that dinner, I will show you the full table, which will be in pink, purple and red.
New projects - 0
Witnesses at the prince’s ball told police that the prince was acting normally until the mysterious princess arrived, when at once he only had eyes for her, romantics believed he had found love at first sight and older guests at the ball were said to suspect witchcraft but kept quiet.
22C. WOOD-AGED BEER
I wonder if you got big plans too? I wonder if you have made sufficient plans for tomorrow. I wonder if you want something different or better perhaps for you and your family? If you do, pen something down. Set timeframes, put them where you can see them. Ponder on them and visit The Throne Room
look at the stars when we're together
This has been one of my most favorite hops that I've been a part of. I LOVE upcycling projects! What better way to push and test your creativity and try new things? I had so many ideas for this one that I had to narrow it down to a few. For this post, at least. I'll post the other projects I did over the next few days.
Exibition shalll be in the Art of the Heart Gallery in Monrovia, Liberia. This is the Gallery of the famous artist A. Leslie Lumeh. and on this blog.
In another letter, John's attorney tries to say that I should lose custody because he believes that I'm practicing witchcraft, which is not condoned by John's conservative Pentacostal Christian faith.
Today....I am living in the present.
I also have an intense fear of heights. Well, not really the heights so much as the potential of falling from them. A few years ago we were in Vegas and I decided to do something totally out of character for me. I hopped on a ride called the X-Scream. I’m not afraid of rides, but this was different. I might not have gotten on it if I had seen it before hand.
In May, the Union recaptured Norfolk. Virginia could not escape past the blockade into the Atlantic and could not retreat up the James River because of her excessive draft. Her crew was forced to blow her up.
Who is praising God that you're still reading? This sister.
Wilma's slow pace is costing us too much in marina fees, rental car days, and motel nights. When all is said and done, we'll have gone through more than a month's worth of cruising budget in order to spend this week on land. And I know we've been making the best decisions we could with the information that was available at each decision point, but it's pretty frustrating that we could have had another day or two in the Tortugas or Key West.
On the domestic front, after never having them before, The Geej has contracted lice twice since September. The most recent lice-fest began this past Tuesday when she nonchalantly mentioned at the breakfast table, "My head is itchy." And sure enough, looked at her sclap and there those nasty bastards were. I beelined it to Walgreen's and bought a remedy that lands on the effectiveness spectrum somewhere between scalp napalm and tap water. So far, so good, but WHAT a pain in the ass. I kept her home from school that day while I cleaned everything that had come into contact with her noggin for the past week and treated her scalp, twice. We're still treating her each night and looking for those goddamned nits, but the fucking school and aftercare that she attends better be doing THEIR part to check for infestation, or it's all for naught. I alerted both of them about our situation on Tuesday and got a couple of vaguely reassuring emails about their policies, etc., but I think they should put that shit on lock-down until they are sure that shit's under control. Blech. I guess the ONLY good thing about getting lice in this day and age is that there it is far less stigma around it than it was when I was a kid. I got lice in 5th grade, presumably from the new, non-English speaking student I was tutoring in, no kidding, a broom closet. Her name was Ofelia, and she was 14 years old. I was 11. Our school was utterly unprepared to handle the needs of a student who didn't speak a word of English, so they enrolled her in 5th grade (instead of 7th or 8th, where she should've been age-wise) and then assigned a "gifted" student (moi) to sit in a broom closet with her and go over books that were intended for pre-schoolers. During that period, I got lice. And not only was my mother HORRIFIED (I might as well have come home with a lamprey stuck to my face), the school kept it all on the down-low and treated me and Ofelia like we were radioactive. I was so ashamed to have gotten such a "dirty" ailment, and my mother put a stop to my daily broom closet rendezvous with Ofelia and we were, instead, allowed to sit at a small tabel in the corner of the classroom for our tutoring sessions, which meant we weren't quite so close together. I eventually got over my lice, and Ofelia eventually left our school.
Victor’s use “carte blanche” as a concept were you in advance of the dinner (i.e. in the booking procedure) tell the restaurant if you have any allergies etc. Then we you arrive in the restaurant you basically chose your desired size of the dinner but do not have a menu to chose dishes from. We went for the “Voyage Culinaire” which is their biggest alternative (“7 dishes”) but we also opted for two additional surprise dishes. We were then asked if we really were that hungry by first the waitress taking the order, and then also later by chef Bau´s wife though this was something that usually only customers that have been here several times before used to go for. We then told them that we were happy with the “standard” menu, but then after some minutes, the kitchen staff had observed us and we were told that they thought it should go well…
No one will die from this
This is a favorite picture of mine. We were going to a Halloween party.
Read the rest of the DVD review for "Meglos," as well as the Patrick Troughton tale "The Dominators" by clicking here and visiting Bullz-Eye.
Eielson AFB – Southeast of Fairbanks. Operation Garden Plot facility.
Wow I feel bad. I think going from nothing to everything was a really really terrible idea. I’m food hungover. I loved the food SO much last night but my body is very displeased today. Oops.
blancs on their southern foray.
Then, I had an encounter with a Robin. He was sitting on the mulberry tree and I was sitting on the floor of our private deck, out of our bedroom. Here it goes - by the way, you are allowed to laugh your sweet butts off !
Maybe photoshop is overrated.
They guessed that advertising "would be the breath of life in commerce," that "cheap and speedy transportation" would decentralize populations and suburban life would expand due to the growth of "rapid transit," and that the telephone and telegraph would become commonplace.
Sigh. So, in the end, I got a lovely ticket with a price tag of $115 and I get to attend a fun-filled, 4 hour traffic school, the side door of my van is smashed in (but thankfully, still usable), and I'm scared half-to-death to drive. Oh and another parent from the Battle of the Books got ahold of me, I filled her in on what was going on and she sent another parent over to pick up Jax and take him to the library. (They won their first battle despite my slacker son who didn't do his fair share of the reading.)
Now, it doesn’t really say that’s what Gideon thought, but it does say that God showed up during the night to confirm what he’d told him earlier. So I figure Gideon had one of those middle-of-the-night freak out moments, and God understood and met him in his fear.
“I am a way-shower to the mighty Source of All”
This is the city who honored me with titles such as a nanny, a bar tender, a student, an artist, a dancer, a single individual, a woman, a foreigner, a manager, a divorcee and a unique individual. This is the city in which I learned what it meant to say good bye over and over again when friends move away, leaving you behind in the arms of the city to find myself at a local bar and the next story sitting near you on the bar stool if you just listen closely enough. This is the city in which I was a poi spinner for one moment and a burlesque dancer for another, a pottery maker for about second and an acting student forever. This is the city in which I got a piercing and danced to break beats into Burning Man and back.
Did you know that it’s possible to measure the effectiveness of a fashion PR campaign? As a PR graduate student I am always looking for ways to measure the success of my efforts. Anyone working in the public relations industry knows that we don’t research our audience for hours on end, create concise communication/business objectives, or perfect goals for nothing. The PR campaign design process is a methodical science. Who wouldn’t want to have a tool to measure success after all the research and work?
Double edit: Tainted Love… It calls for a return to the floor.
Although not a formal NATO operation, the war and occupation in Iraq received assistance from the alliance beforehand – deployment of Patriot interceptor missiles and AWACS surveillance aircraft to Turkey – and afterward, with NATO supporting the Multi-National Force – Iraq and operations in the Polish-led South Central zone and running the NATO Training Mission-Iraq. The first commander of the latter was current Central Intelligence Agency director and former ISAF commander David Petraeus.
Do you read / believe in your horoscope?
with that in mind, i have gathered a few gorgeous tablescapes that can easily be translated to your own homes and your celebrations. all photos from house beautiful.
One evening, I was taking shower. I wanted to take shower before sadistic comes home from somewhere. I wanted to get cleaned up and stay in my room, to be unnoticeable. Sometimes he doesn’t pay attention to me especially when he’s on crack or acid. As long I don’t move or look at him in the eyes, I’ll be okay. I was enjoying my shower, peace and quiet; a piece of normalcy. All of sudden, the shower curtain ripped wide open, the water showered out of the tub. I cringed out of reaction. I peeked through my arms and saw it was him, angry and holding wire hanger. He made it into one long wire stick. I looked at him with questioning eyes, afraid to say something lest I make him angrier by speaking. I cringed away; bracing myself for the pain when I saw him raised his fisted hand with hanger over his head. I didn’t feel the impact but I felt the burning pain that the shower water touched. I cried & begged him to stop after I felt more burning lines on my back. He stopped and grabbed my hair out of the shower tub and twisted the wire hanger around my wrists and hooked it over the bathroom door. I’m standing my toes against the door. The sadistic is grabbing my face, screaming at me. I’m squinting my eyes shut. I’m more afraid of seeing hits, slaps, & grabbing coming to me than feeling the impacts of them. He is slapping me everywhere; my face, my breasts, my pussy, & my thighs. I couldn’t help not to make noises. I tried to keep quiet but couldn’t. He stopped and flipped over hard, fixing the wire around my wrists, made it tighter. My front is against the door, he’s grabbing my ass, squeezing it really hard. Whispering things in my ear; I couldn’t understand him. He got off and then held my head against the door, spanking me. It got to the point, I couldn’t tip toe anymore, letting my wrists take the weight. It hurt more but I couldn’t stand. Then he grabbed my ass and spread it open, started to fuck me all the way in and out slowly, alternating between my ass and my pussy. It felt so good, I started to make noises that I was enjoying it. What a mistake… he stopped and grabbed my tits, pulling them down and started to fuck me in the ass. That hurt more. I thought he was going to tear me apart inside. When he was done, he unhooked the wire from the door and I just slumped to the floor, leaving the bathroom and me on the floor. My wrists and hands are numbed and little blue, my ass and whole back burned. I got up gingerly and turned off the light to get rid of unwanted attention that there is “someone” in the bathroom. I stayed there in a way of hiding. I got into the tub and slept there all night, hiding under the curtain. I was cold, wet, and so sore. Through the night, he came in, ignoring me or forgot about me, using the bathroom for few moments. The next morning, he left to go somewhere, I got out and looked at the mirror, and my back was crisscrossed with welts & scabby. I still have some scars from it, 15 years later. My wrists have scars from the wire digging into my skin. I walked slowly since I was so sore; went to my room, got dressed into baggy shirt and underwear. I went into the kitchen and grabbed crackers& Dr. Pepper and went to my bedroom closet to hide and sleep. I stayed there for couple of days, recovering.
Candlelight Records today launches a free label sampler available exclusively from Amazon.com. The 8-song sampler includes previously unreleased material from FALLOCH, THE ROTTED, WODENSTHRONE, SEAR BLISS, WOE, WINTERFYLLETH, RUMPELSTILTSKIN GRINDER and includes the first single from IHSAHN’s new album Eremita.
" grateful that I can have a good nights sleep....please bless mommy... "
Oh, how much there is to say about this abomination of a sentence. Where to start? If Riker is grinning to hide his nervousness, we don't need the word "slightly." We have all seen a nervous grin. "Ineffectual" is unnecessary in this instance. Don't believe me? Read the whole sentence without that word. The effect is the same. Of course the astute captain will see through a nervous grin. I'm not even sure astute is needed, but I am willing to let that slide.
Shock, horreur! Lock up your daughters!
APPLIED: Is the Work of the church and the service of your ministers a source of pride for you…or a drudgery of obligation and a subject you never bring up? Whatever your response…consider how it is a reflection on the God of the Universe who calls, equips, establishes, and empowers.
revealing a creature too raw, too vulnerable for the world to receive.
How can I help but hate it. How can I help but feel trapped by its omnipresence, its insistence, its ubiquity? How can I help but recognize that every single day I make real choices that place money above time with my family, above social justice, above environmental sustainability, above my own callings in life. How can I help but resent it?
Well, I think not only humans don’t necessarily like it when they are getting soaked, I know for a fact that not only humans don’t like this feeling. Gazillion of others feel the same. And all of a sudden they all seek refuge in our house.
Regarding taste in music, I listen to almost everything. When I ask most of my peers what they listen to, they usually respond with ‘Hindi film music’. Now this means two things. One, they haven’t expanded their repertoire to include international (read English) music. Two, they’ve experienced almost all the genres that music has to throw at them! Contradictory notions, right! Well, it’s true. Today’s Hindi film music composers are experimenting and utilizing all sorts of musical genres when making music. The latest genre to enter Bollywood is Dubstep. People who’ve never listened to The Glitch Mob or Skrillex have experienced it in Amit Trivedi’s Aafaton ke Parindey from the film Ishaqzaade. Rock and Hip-hop, Jazz and Pop, all come together in one album in your average Bollywood album. So just by listening to “apun ka Hindi fillum mujhik”, people have really experienced a lot of musical genres.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: Yes, I am. All Muslims are against Christian proselytizing. Who can accept Muslims being converted to Christianity? No one can accept this.
* I feel like that when I teach I will use a lot of both types. I feel like if I had the time I would teach relational understanding and I feel as though for really important topics I will teach this way, however I also feel like with all of the requirements there is no way you can teach like this all of the time and be effective at it. Because of this I feel like I will end up teaching instrumentally most of the time just simply because it will allow me to get through the material faster and help the students understand best in the little amount of time given to cover each topic. However if individual students are confused or there is extra time available I will try to teach using relational understanding.
The pool final – The George Harrison Shield, played by both our female & gents home teams. It was won victoriously by the men !
Make some salad and sammies, jump in the car, and head to the Heide Museum in Bulleen. On a nice day, you can sit on the grass amongst the sculptures, soaking up the serenity (and art) as you munch on yo lunch. On not-so-nice days, book a table at Cafe Vue, have a little tipple, then stroll through the museum admiring the luvverly artworks… A nice activity to do with your folks, if you’re after something parent-friendly.
Hello, my name is Belinda and this is my first ever blog!!! So bare with me.
“You can’t do this, Captain,” Claypool pleaded. “You can’t decide the fate of another human being with a handful of plastic.” He crossed his arms and pouted. “You can’t make me draw.”
Some women consider this book to be the best thing since “The Rules” and “He’s Just Not That Into You” when it comes to romantic strategy to help women land the men they want.
Just logged in briefly this morning to check a thing or two, just not a lot of time. Someone had come alone and bought up all my Amarrian Starship Datacores I had on the local regional market. That was Datacores I had on the market for a while at a higher price than normal. Logging into Jita and Amarrian Starship Datacores prices were way up and quite a lot of buying was happening in last day or so. Hmmm
Back to the drawing board!
D. Dogs: Maggie Boxer and Little Jon the chihuahua
One thing that is annoying about some of the “gun forums” you visit is that you get some people that say “the XXX is the best gun” or “this gun sucks”. Now I’m not going to say these three are hands down the best. However, in my opinion they are some of the best all around multi-purpose .22 rifles out there. Furthermore, each weapon is very reasonably priced and each weapon would work fine as a stand alone small game hunting rifle, home defense weapon, plinking rifle, or survival rifle (I’ll talk more specifically about survival rifles in my next post).
Hey Dawn! I was at Lake Tahoe this past weekend, I happened to stumble across a wooden plate that read "Who are these kids and why are they calling me 'Mom'?!"Do you have any wooden plates of the liking or would at the moment like one for your birthday?
Last but certainly not least, there is a Facebook page for my radio persona:
Ramblin'? I'd say...
Stu Kimball - rhythm guitar
Volomir: Can you tell us something about your upcoming projects? Is there something as big as the diorama coming in the near future?
I can’t choose a best speaker but here are some things I learned that I’d like to pass along. Since I can’t fit all I learned on one post, and you don’t want to read a book in one post, I’m splitting up my post into four parts. This first post is about what I learned from Steven James on “Building Three-dimensional Characters.” Easily the most immediate information I’ll use on my current project.
Limited as usual to 300 hand numbered copies : 50 first on limited edition and colored vinyl, 250 next on regular cover. 8 test pressings should be made. Test pressings will be made as usual with a special cover...Listen to Abortion Squad and purchase the Lp.
and yay for internet connection...
- Hair pulled back
Oh yeah, shingles....
FB: You know, a velour pour l'hiver. (FB's most useless learning tool for me...I ask what something means in French, he repeats it back in French. Thanks. So helpful.)
This is a great information to your automobile lovers plus there is yet another news that will appeal to your interest people. Do you know that you get custom made t-shirts by using automobile themes to them. 99tshirts.com is an on the internet apparels shop that offers you these attractive custom t-shirts with various designs or templates that include governmental topics, cartoon themes, interesting themes, technical subjects, eco-friendly styles, automobile themes or layouts and so on. Automobile designs in the sense, you would get t-shirts having fantastic types & pics of your favorite autos. You are given the choice to customize your t-shirts by simply uploading your favorite pics and designing ones own custom tees on the net. When you finally design all of them, you could position the sequence for the same and get the idea delivered within a limited time amount at your doorsteps. You get t-shirts of a large choice and styles. .
Suckle blooms then obscure
A few weeks later I was out shopping with a buddy when I came upon another dress. It wasn't bedazzled, and it wasn't lime green, but I really, really liked it. And better yet it was about 1/3 of the price of my dream gown. I decided to say yes to the dress.
Brazil’s richest man is gearing up to take over the world. Making a play for foreign investors, Batista announced this year the opening of an office in New York and his intention to list some of his companies on the London Stock Exchange. Through his holding company, EBX, Batista controls businesses spanning mining, shipbuilding, energy, logistics, tourism and entertainment. After months of discussions, he was triumphant in February in taking control of Canadian gold outfit Ventana. Two-thirds of his fortune comes from OGX, the oil and gas exploration company he founded in 2007 and took public a year later. He says the company will start producing oil this year. In rare recent setback, his planned IPO for his shipbuilding business (OSX), meant to be the world’s largest IPO in 2010, was a disappointment and has had a lukewarm reception in the Brazilian market.
Makes a 9×13-inch cake or about 24 cup cakes
You can also be a GGG (Gurlette Guilt Guru) if you want to guilt trip a gurlette (or gurlettes) who hasn’t posted for the week or if you want to do some changes on the blog such as the intro or the layout. You can make a post about it and sign it as GGG. K. K?
“Are you listening?” She asked.
Perhaps the answer begins by thinking about and recognizing some of the principles put forward in this article….
It got to the point where someone thought I wanted them to have the front seat of his car removed to check for a piece of jewelry of mine that fell somewhere in the car (admittedly it was of great sentimental importance and not insignificant cost). Obviously, that's not what I wanted at all - who would ask for such a thing? I was trying to say that since the only way to find it after having the dealership search thoroughly with flashlights and coming up empty-handed was to remove the seat, but as that was ridiculous, to forget about it and just accept that these things happen.
Premise #1: Zombies are created by some kind of disease or biological agent that, once it infects its host, transforms them into a zombie over a variable period of time (from a few minutes to a few hours, depending upon dramatic license). This agent is almost universally transmitted via bodily fluids of some kind, chiefly blood and/or saliva.
BENNETT ... Influenza vaccination of health care workers in long-term-care hospitals reduces the mortality of elderly patients. J Am Geriatr Soc 1997; 45: 898-899.
The Drinks and Snacks pack includes Milk, Orange Juice, a Vitamin drink, a bag of lettuce (I think!), two rice dishes and, from what I gather, a box of fried squid. (Not exactly what I’m used to eating, but that makes this set even cooler!)
I went to First Landing State Park and did the Cape Henry Trail, for a total of ten miles. It was the perfect day, if not a little windy. The high today is supposed to be 59 and I think it was around 55 when I was walking. That’s comfortable, right? Some dude thought that he was in the freaking tropics and was taking a leisurely stroll with no shirt on!
Here is Joey Ramone with a great tune I have been blasting all week, sure to put a smile on your face. And the equally infections Dahlmanns tribute.
As far as seminary expenses goes, I knew beforehand that seminary is expensive, but JESUS CHRIST, does it HAVE to be over $50,000 to get an M.Div.??
Nuts.com offers you a choice of shipping methods, and you can even select the day you want your item to ship. Friendly emails confirm your order and let you know when it’s on its way. The company processes orders very quickly. I got a free sample of a product not on my shopping list included in my most-recent purchase. Nuts.com also offers a satisfaction guarantee.
Show your spirit. You will get three free beer tokens if you come in German attire. There are also contests for Miss Oktoberfest and Best Baltimore Beer Belly.
elements or elephants
So here it is. 8:00pm. #19. Served.
The plane landed in Manila after 3 hours, and as I walk out to the airport I saw a throng of press people waiting at the lobby. I saw TV Patrol’s new showbiz reporter, CAMILLE RAMOS and she and her crew seemed to be waiting for someone. I stopped to wave but she didn’t see me because someone finally arrived. With guards and assistants around her Ms. International 2015 RUSSEL NHERIE BERNABE went back to the Philippines after coaching and attending Ms. International 2021. She also visited the OFWs in Hawaii while she was there, extending her ear to all our needy fellowmen as the Philippines’ Ambassador of Goodwill. And since they seem to be all so busy I decided to leave peacefully, thinking I should interview her too for a women empowerment article.
Browns Ferry nuclear plant won’t restart so long as so much of the grid is down, TVA chief of operations was quoted as saying.
This post is going to be kind of random….I have some topics I want to address but taken alone, they would make really lame, really short posts. Maybe if I combine them all together, there may be a theme and it will be a win-win…I get to vent/think aloud about lots of things all at once and you my readers get to be entertained. Who knows? And before I get started with all I want to say, I HAVE to say this before anything else: the Duggars are completely and certifiably INSANE and need hobbies and/or a television. For real. Totally random, I know but had to be said.
Greek Village Taverna makes its own Gyro meat in-house. No MSG or commercial seasoning mixes are used here, and only a minimum amount of salt. Probably the best gyro in the entire area. By the way, the cucumber Tzatziki sauce that comes with it is outstanding — he uses English cucumbers and mixes it with the same superdense FAGE yogurt he uses for the other mezze — if you turn the cup upside down, it doesn’t fall out, that’s how thick and rich the stuff is.
The first time ‘The London Salon Trophy’, a much-coveted International award (in those days) for artistic photography had ever been awarded for a colour photograph was in 1967. It was presented to John Neville Cohen for his creation ‘Spirit of Spring’; John was the youngest salon member ever to have received it. This was also the very first time a transparency and a negative appeared on the same film emulsion. Although technically extraordinary, it is more importantly a very fine work of art.
01 Dec – SACTWU, Salt River
Disneyland (3 times)
January 21, 2007 Clip No. 1366
Either way Nationalists are warned to stay well clear of it, for it appears to be on a collision course with the law.
Before I move on to the next point of contention, I want to touch a bit on these papers that have to be written and signed, according to the new bill. Most of us are familiar with the general working of doctor’s offices these days. As it stands, most doctors don’t even discuss vaccines but instead simply state that your child is due for them. There is never an option given to opt out and most people are not aware that it is even possible to do so. Most offices don’t keep you in for the appropriate time to watch for an allergic or otherwise reaction after injection and most doctors have absolutely no clue, what the signs of a reaction are. Multiple stories from families all ring the same ‘the doctor would not even consider that a reaction was possible’ ‘the doctor kept denying that it could be the vaccine, despite all other possibilities being ruled out’ ‘my baby turned blue and stopped breathing and he just kept saying, it’s not the vaccine, it’s not the vaccine’.
which is spring. There's something about nature rebuilding herself that I love; a reminder that darkness does eventually pass, and the rebirth of sunshine and warmer days are the perfect symbolism for spiritual regrowth. The most beautiful days I've ever experienced have been born on the heels of an ugly rainstorm. The air is crisp, and just smells cleaner.
Since I have reusing my yeast as one of my Brew Year Goals, I took a look at the recipes and found a number of series using the same yeast and primary malt. None require a secondary or dry hopping or exceed an original gravity of 1.070, which would seem to make them ideal candidates for yeast reuse. I have them listed here by increasing alcohol content, which is what some recommend.
At best we can make an imperfect offering, but an offering nonetheless. Orbinski says, “. . . no one can do everything, but everyone can do something.”
We might wonder about a policeman who distinguishes between a soldier and the soldier’s gun only in terms of their capacity to threaten. Klaatu isn’t so concerned, because Gort was built by people like him; that is, the very beings Gort oversees. But it doesn’t seem like they can stop him once he’s on the job. And so I always finish The Day the Earth Stood Still wondering how wise Klaatu really is. Did his people solve any of their problems, or did they just cede all their discipline to a bunch of machines? Is humanity’s mish-mash of ideologies—by comparison so inelegant and imprecise—actually any worse? Klaatu’s only message, spoken so gracefully, is that greater force trumps lesser force. However, should the day come when Gort makes a mistake, no one will be smiling. And no one, anywhere, will know what to do.
Clothespins - success. I love how I can still see the wood grain. The only thing with the pins is they didn't dye where the wood is together - so when I open the pin the original wood color is still there.
Poem or song: Ruth Pitter's The Heart's Desire is Full of Sleep because it says what I feel about my life.
The search for ‘the real thing’ had moved from professional copies to youth that could act as they were living their life in London or Liverpool.
Discovered in Manchester, England (2011).
I was a little on edge, and as I looked around the room, I saw all the families, sitting and having fun and enjoying each others company. It was my first church Christmas party without my hubby. I didn't think it would affect me so much, but it did. It was all I could do to keep from bursting out in tears every time I looked at another family. Jimmy was done eating, and wanted to go and play. I just KNEW that the Mayor of Whooville would ream me out if Jim left the table, so I made him sit. He was trying to get away, and fell off the chair, and bumped his head on the floor. I was upset, and didn't give him the comfort that he really needed. I know, I can be a heartless mom. I was just trying to keep it all together.
All That Jazz, one of my favorite movies, is meandering, infuriating and surreal, packed with dance numbers and music. Scripted by Robert Alan Aurthur, and owing Federico Fellini's 8 ½ a debt too large to repay, Fosse reimagines the musical drama of his own life, sometimes employing original cast members (Ann Reinking plays a character based on herself), while crafting a self-congratulatory piece that screams "I am Bob Fosse! I am breathing down the Grim Reaper's neck because I'm a drug-addicted workaholic! Partake in my world of cynical Broadway smut, and celebrate me before it's too late!" Prairie is also meandering, infuriating, surreal and full of music. Owing All That Jazz a similarly huge debt, Altman builds a dramatic frame around a facsimile of Keillor's long-running radio program and some of its recurring castmembers and characters, while crafting a self-congratulatory piece that declares, "I am Robert Altman! The Grim Reaper is breathing down my neck! Partake in my world of cynical Midwestern sing-a-longs and celebrate me before it's too late!"
Trolling people you think are trolls is all fun and games until someone actually commits suicide. The details are still fuzzy, but some redditors may be sued for contributing to a wrongful death.
I didn’t sleep well at all, and in fact was probably up from 1am to 6am where I finally dozed off for a couple of hours.
You’ll see everything from calligraphy to canned goods!
In the early afternoon of Wednesday, the Raïs read his State of the
It's certainly been a wild ride. Thank God for seat belts!
I also had lots of peaceful time to work on my floor plans and house projects, and I can say I was born for this life.
And kiss her lips and take her hands;
-- MLB Baseball
Me...and you (but honestly, mostly me)!
Selexyz Domincanen is a modern day bookstore housed in a 13th century gothic church. For five hundred years the church served the Dominicans until post-revolutionary French troops took over the city of Maastricht in 1794 and threw the Friars out.
Who will forever... And who never made the grade.
I liked it, I really did. I just can't say why. And this isn't like all those other reviews I write where I say I wish I could just simply say I liked it.
Chaat masala sprinkled as per taste (About 1/8 tsp.)
when I allow myself to think it. But still,
The next set is using the image in miniature.
For office-based workers the tipping point at which staff felt that their working life started to interfere with their home life came after 38 hours of work a week.
Because of this tragedy and loss to your father, I named you after his boss, Tom Haney. So today the memory of that time is carried on each time I speak your name. Honor the memories!
Quantitative Methods for Political Science
Please note that my dog gets in almost every photo. Now the camera is away he is back on the sofa asleep.
I know you care, and thats all it takes.
Night & morn
Since political assassination tends to be frowned upon, and occasionally triggers a world war (and, of course, the damage done would remain), that leaves the ballot box (or revolution, but let’s stay legal for now), and a major problem.
I love this site, and you give great help in a hilarious way. But for all this talk demanding good queries, you only post the bad ones. It's all educational, sure, but for those of us sending a good query per instruction hoping then for info on how to make it spectacular, we're ignored in favor of posting the truly awful ones. It's unfair that the ones who do follow these "strict" instructions are the ones never featured.
Stat-wise, It has a lot of Attack and Speed, but poor Defense, combined with 5 weaknesses that are fairly common.
How then can Najib have the cheek to stand before the Malaysian people and try to sound all cosy and nice when he has just spent tons of their money to create the very image that he is falsely parading to them? Incredibly thick-skinned may be one explanation, another would be a sheer lack of conscience.
$39
(Lionsgate) Jason Statham, Anson Mount, Chris Sarandon, Catherine Chan. A disgraced detective whose meddling into the affairs of the Russian mob got his family killed and a stigma placed on him – that anyone he knows will be murdered by the mob – spies a young Asian girl being threatened by the mob and is moved to intervene. He discovers that the girl has a talent for memorizing long numbers and holds in her mind a number that not only the Russian mob but also the Chinese mob and the police want very badly. It will be up to protect her from the multitude of crooks and crooked cops out to get the two of them and achieve some kind of redemption.
not his mad Wii Dancing skills.
*** You could also do the same thing with round labels and make your own sticker/seals... (like I sell in my store...wink, wink :)
said my husband to me during our anniversary trip to California.
When it comes to endings, it's important to appreciate what an ending is supposed to do. And not do.
1 sweet vidalia onion or leek (white and light green part only), sliced
I agreed to have dinner with him on Friday, and we made plans to meet at one of the fanciest, most expensive restaurants in town. I decided that I misjudged the guy. I mean, not everyone teaches language arts.
i give a lot of shit to timequakes, don’t i. most stories are dystopian, in this horrible pathetic destructive hell which crapitulatism forces on all of us. of course narratives of this plane of existence are going to be about “unwinnable” wars by stout-hearted, efficiently-fueled rebels. the only narratives that can “sell” are based on these wars, for the same reason that logic isn’t allowed. destruction is the name of crapitulism. it is its purpose, its intent, and its means. cooperation is only amongst a select group of “experts” whose thoughts have been massaged and repeated for years. anyone with actual mathematical ability gets forced out of the study of anything of actual use or applicability and into infinite loops of useless trivia. although the uselessness of the “facts” which they study is frightfully popular amongst the poisoned masses, this diversionary tactic serves only to squash dissent amongst humans. 1:37 pm
Then we came home from church to a missed call from the caseworker. She left a message that said she was sorry, but the mom had picked another family. Yet again.
either of my author names), and LiveJournal, and I'm part of the group blog Writers Plot. I send out a lot of bookmarks to readers. I have a periodic (electronic) newsletter, and I take on just about every appearance that's offered to me. I've also found a lot of new readers on cozy mystery (Yahoo!) reader lists.
There's also a really interesting moment you just wouldn't get on a modern program today, when the Doctor calls UNIT in search of the Brigadier only to be told he's not there. They didn't have mobile phones so the Doctor just has to say "Tell I'll call him back later."
7:30 Arrive work: answer emails, phone messages, counsel students, check assignments
To end with, here are a few facts and figures:
I'm feeling fine...and loving all of the mini symptoms I've experienced thus far. I'm getting a little more fatigued during the day, my sense of smell is that of a bloodhound, looks like I've had a boob job, intermittent cramping, and some lower back pain. All of these symptoms come and go. I actually feel...normal. Sometimes I forget that my body is going haywire inside right now! Hopefully these are signs of a viable pregnancy.
Or in a thousand more, forgot that too.
“What more important than this email to the CEO of *mind your damn business*?”
i hope i have guarded it well
Which makes it appropriate to ask, Are you changing culture, or is culture changing you?
She responds by buying a gun from a Persian trader (Gaudfroy). Now, she exclaims, she has the most powerful weapon in the world at her disposal. She also has a lover, the cowardly and timid Li (Shen-Yang) who mostly wears pink and rarely does anything that his lover doesn’t approve of.
Beyond stunning jewelry and design elements, Daniel R. Spirer is a full service Jeweler offering custom work, repairs, and appraisals. With over 30 years of jewelry appraising experience and almost 40 years in the industry, the company knows which approach is best and when no approach will work at all. Most repairs are guaranteed for two years and as an additional service, unlimited lifetime cleaning is offered on any jewelry from Daniel R. Spirer Jewelers. More information can be found online athttp://www.partypop.com/v/4322572.
Can they evade their greedy pursuers? And will they ever find their way home?
So while I've been resting, I've gotten to indulge myself in some guilty pleasures. I've been watching "The Tudors" on Netflix on my daughter's iPad. I had only ever found time to watch the first season. I'm now on Season 4!!!! I'm loving it!!! The other two movies DH and I just watched back-to-back was the Swedish version of "The Girl with the Dragon Tattoo" and "The Girl Who Played with Fire." My neighbor lent them to us and they were amazing!!! I haven't read the books, so we had no idea what to expect. I've heard critics say the new Hollywood version is not as good and we haven't seen that, but I can see why. It was just unbelievable. If you like action/suspense/mystery type movies, this is for you! Of course, DH didn't mind watching a movie with English subtitles, as being a hearing-impaired person (not that he will admit), he doesn't miss a single part of the dialogue. When we were starting to date, I got him hooked on watching foreign movies with subtitles. Usually the story lines are better than Hollywood ones and you don't mind reading the bottom of the screen. I will admit "Like Water for Chocolate" is one of my favorite movies with subtitles. It's so romantic and extreme.
In the USA, there is also an inject able polio vaccine by Connaught Labs which contains foetal tissue, as does the Varicella (Chickenpox) vaccine.
How did our shame blown away?
For today's masculine card, I based the design on March's Sketch for You to Try and used the new Furry Dress Up Fhiona. I'm not quite sure if I was going for a monkey or a bear but it's cute none the less :) I made a little flag for my sentiment and attached it with a wood button. After I had put the card together I found it needed a little something up the left hand panel so I added a row of zig zag stitches with my sewing machine.
Kid Kong art Robert Nixon
Concerining bitterness the bible says in Ephesians 4:31 “Let all bitterness and wrath and anger and clamor, and evil speaking, be put away from you, with all malice.”
(yields 24 pieces)
Epilogue:
The grass was a bit torturous too, so after the first three I made my husband do it. I sent him to get the candy too. So, in the end, I guess all I did was make the soil for the dirt cupcakes and put the eggs on the grassy cupcakes. I wish more projects could be like this.
My word, is it that time of year already?
We made our way to The Biscuit for lattes, warm baked things and the company of strangers. We're so lucky, you and I, he said. We counted our blessings, lingered, and finally it was time to board my bus back to Brooklyn, back to New York.
I pinned the article to a bulletin board above my drawing table where the photo of Bill seemed to stare me down, goading me to tell his story. I ignored Bill for several years.
Suites on the block
This was an interesting book. I read it almost all in one sitting, which would not have been bad, if I hadn’t started it right before going to bed.
But South Africa proved worrying and we made our escape.
Then just unroll and use as you normally would. We taped them to the wall in a criss-cross pattern over the food table. Smile politely when your husband says, "I didn't know where you were going with those babe, but now they look cool!" Resist the urge to scream, "In yo face!" or "Wait until you see what color I'm painting the Dining Room!"
“Now we have a different challenge. We need to make it financially sustainable.”
Descent into madness–And living with consequences in the end! This is like The Hangover meets Donkey Punch.
Since I’m pretty sure Tony never reads my blog I can say this – dude! Fruit not flowers for gosh sakes! I love you but your taste in birthday presents for your Mom could use some improvement. And – oh yeah – Mother’s day is coming up.
Dick Griffin, Clifford Adams: tenor trombone
BUT if you know anything about the RNC…….. I would say that maybe ” this time around ….surely represents a lights off – out scenario “
“I cannot afford any MRT disruption especially since it takes me two-and-a-half hours to get to NTU (in Boon Lay). A taxi trip to school would cost me a bomb,” Mr Teng said.
On the All Music Guide site, Richie Unterberger pans the album (as he does many albums it seems) complaining that the “songs are not good, moving, or very melodic, and his voice is pleasant but no more than adequate.” But while it’s not Dylan or even Fred Neil, I certainly find much to like about the record. There are some really excellent tracks here, including the mock-Dylan satire “Long Black Cadillac” (which Unterberger, ignoring the history between Dylan and Washington, calls a “silly-sounding Bob Dylan sound-alike”) and “A Night in June” (for which he has more appreciation). And while a few of the other tracks are certainly duds, the overall effect is entertaining and just different enough from the standard folk fare of the era to be worth a listen or more. But don't trust my review either, listen to the music and make up your own mind.
The unfashionableness of Der Freischütz in England is a little baffling. In its day, not only was the opera celebrated across Germany, it soon conquered other European stages and indeed theatres worldwide. Premiered at the Berlin Schauspielhaus in 1821, by the end of the decade it had already received productions in Danish, Swedish, Czech, Russian, English, French, Hungarian, Polish and Dutch, and by 1850, stagings had been mounted as far afield as Cape Town, Rio de Janeiro, and Sydney. Of course, it is in many ways the quintessential German Romantic opera, though one should always remember how much influence other ‘national’ traditions wield over it, but it is saddening that we, or at least the powers that be, should apparently evince so little interest in this tradition. Oberon was programmed to appear this season at Covent Garden, a mouthwatering prospect, only to be cancelled in favour of yet another run – within the same season! – for La traviata. The only staging of Der Freischütz I have seen in London, or indeed elsewhere, was that by ENO in 1999. Meanwhile, Calixto Bieito has just presented a new production in Berlin for the Komische Oper, a must-see staging by all accounts. Perhaps ENO, with its reinvigorated interest in co-productions will bring it across the Channel at some point; we can but hope. Many thanks, in any case, are due to the LSO for this concert performance.
The MacGuffin is often an object that has no meaning other than simply being valuable. It’s sometimes just a thing that the story revolves around, something that moves the plot forward. For example, we never find out what’s actually on the secret microfilm in Hitchcock’s “North by Northwest.”
That 2000 production was Songs From Across The Century, moving from Gershwin and music hall through Buddy Holly and the Everly Brothers, finishing up with the Spice Girls (don’t look at me like that; we had a number of teenage girls in the cast and you have to give them something). I adapted an old I’m Sorry, I’ll Read That Again sketch and added a ditzy sound effects girl (played with great gusto by the minister’s wife, who was also Mrs Potiphar in Joseph and Yvette in the ‘Allo ‘Allo sketches we did). Come the finale we had the whole audience singing ‘White Christmas’, which is as good a show-closer as any. And stage right: my father, in an absurd scarf and black fright wig, sweltering in my dark blue overcoat.
Along the beach were these gorgeous flowers.....
I am so proud to live in Kentucky and so proud to have been born and raised loving the wildcats. I can remembering going UK games with dad at a kid and being a UK cheerleader many years for Halloween. It's incredible being in the Big Blue Nation. You may never understand the love the fans has for this team year after year, but I assure you it's incredible. I will also miss the superb players that are moving on to the NBA to fulfill their dreams, as they have fulfilled ours with living through our eighth national championship!
Natural England agreed to grant a rare emergency license to remove the birds - usually forbidden during mating season.
I see anger and frustration
OPWGG Blog (opwggblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
And I can feel
The card I am sharing tonight is one I made a couple of weeks ago for a colleague at work. She is a lovely lady and one of those people for whom nothing is too much trouble.
Not all boots are carriage driving ready. Unlike some winter activities that allow the participant to walk, thus helping circulate blood flow, we do a lot of either sitting or standing around, sometimes in several inches of snow. I have two metal screws in each of my feet due to bunion surgery several years ago, so cold transference happens at a faster rate for my feet then to other, non-metal infused folk. So I take my footwear seriously.
Armed with a full pot of ink, she was soon in full flow. A little after midday and the task was complete:)))
so here we go
From here, it didn’t take long to pull a few sentences together.
It was a wonderful new way to live. Drama just faded away and the people in my life became more positive and encouraging. My friends found a more prominent place in my life and the richness of my family became evident.
We urge all of those that take heed to this call to join us and make their voices heard for the immediate suspension of the application of hudûd in the Muslim world so that a real debate establishes itself on the question. We say that in the name of Islam, of its texts and of the message of justice, we can no longer accept that women and men undergo punishment and death while we remain utterly silent, as accomplices, through a process which is ultimately cowardly.
Dave: My wife has a wooden paddle she calls her "hearing paddle". When I don't listen she says she uses it to clean out my ears! Trust me it never gets near my ears but it sure does improve my hearing! ;(
Yesterday our youngest bit me. It's unusual for him and he was playing around, but I wasn't thrilled. I calmly told him biting was not okay. He tried again, and I stopped him.
As my life progressed, I never lost my fascination with the experience of the firmament of night, and even into my adult years with the additional opportunities to view the starry vault from different locations in the world, my heart would always long to fly up into the darkness for a closer look. Something about outer space drew me inexorably up amidst the innumerable elements within the celestial sphere, until one day it finally dawned on me. The universe all around me was my reference point to know that I am truly here.
To October 1965. Sukarno begins his slip from power. Bâri′ M. Shabazz turns six.
Police spokesperson Superintendent Sipho Sinzani said the raid followed information from the community that an ex-soldier was training people to use guns.
Two years ago, Zamzami incited further controversy in Morocco when he said it was permissible for pregnant women to drink alcohol.
come back, and then
New Design Principles
I've done it. I've touched them and made up people that strangers have adopted, loved and identified with.
"Be still, and know that I am God."
It is for these reasons that the comparison to K-pop titans Girls Generation continue to gather steam. Questions remain over whether this new group will attempt to emulate Girls’ Generation’s flawless synchronization style or incorporate 2NE1′s free flowing style to create a never-before-seen performance style.
“Very well, weps.” I wanted to acknowledge his initiative.
Theres some great early comic firework fun here..
I hate cleaning it, I hate using it, I hate the way it sounds, the way it feels, taking care of bottled milk.... pretty much everything about it. I'll use it when I absolutely have to but that's it!
Then, taste buds start rioting, because they’re all jazzed up by the ambiance. It’s all so good, and they can’t get enough. A Technicolored rave, glorious, dark, orgasmically exhilarating. It’s a ruckus and a mess.
Now that the kitchen is done with, I am trying to get back into the challenge (which when I think about it seems pointless because of some things that are coming down the line, but I’ll talk about those if/when they happen). So here’s what I’ve missed and my catching up to the current challenge:
-we get many hugs from you daily as well and we adore them! You especially like to give them to us right after you have gotten in trouble for doing something naughty.....kiss up:) It kills me when I have to tell you I don't want your hug and you still have to go to time out. Secretly I want to cuddle you as much as I can and not punish you.
On February 11, 1998, the Sunday Times reported that ten bodies were dug up from beneath Benjamin Franklin’s home at 36 Craven Street in London. The bodies were of four adults and six children. They were discovered during a costly renovation of Franklin’s former home. The Times reported: “Initial estimates are that the bones are about two hundred years old and were buried at the time Franklin was living in the house, which was his home from 1757 to 1762 and from 1764 to 1775. Most of the bones show signs of having been dissected, sawn or cut. One skull has been drilled with several holes.”
SO what are you waiting for? Go to the shop (or online) and pick this up - you will not regret it, I promise :)
Making things yet worse, was the staff's tendency to conduct their conversations with each other (about whatever was on the 'after-hours' agenda) across the room at whatever volume was necessary, even if it meant leaving menu-clutching punters open mouthed in the middle of placing their order whilst they waited for the chat to conclude. (Which, on one occasion I witnessed, was a moment that never actually came!...The waitress in question in this case continued a conversation with a colleague across the room - pad in hand with half of the customer's food order already written down - until the folks who were trying to complete that order eventually made a decision among themselves to get up and leave. A proactive measure which the waitress herself remained oblivious to until they were long departed.)
I turned a rosy face his way and he started laughing.
A truck and driver are found, a price agreed. The campervan is towed to a local site where a new motorway is being constructed, complete with excavations. One of them is roughly the height of a lorry bed. The truck backs up to the ledge. After a bit of shuffling around, the campervan is successfully pushed onto the lorry.
Examine
Sometimes I hear from wives who complain that their husbands don’t listen enough. I have the opposite problem. My husband listens too well.
Just for now
32) Do you want to dance? No? NO! i said you look fat in those pants!
If you have asked God for something, you must prepare during the process. Most requests don’t happen instantaneously; there is a waiting period. Maximize this opportunity as your gift of time to prepare. If you are given everything you’ve believed for within 15 minutes of reading this, would you be ready to receive it; or would you suddenly find yourself scrambling to prepare? Don’t lose hope and begin to prepare and expect your dreams to come true. If you’ve stopped preparing, regroup and do those things that are necessary to get ready. Remember God has promised to give you and me the desires of our heart. So let’s remain in a state of readiness to receive the promises of God. We have come much too far to even consider turning back. Stand firm on His promises with the confidence of knowing, God’s power and provisions will always exceed our cleverness and our failures.
Or that if you have a child,
base card began with an 8 1/3'x4 1/4 piece tangerine tango card stock which was scored with my stampin up! simply scored scoring tool at 5 1/2. the smaller card was originally cut to 8' x 3 1/4 and scored at 4'
Comin' down
Two years and four days after the drilling-rig explosion that set off the worst offshore oil spill in U.S. history, Kurt Mix, 50, of Katy, Texas, was arrested and charged with two counts of obstruction of justice for allegedly destroying evidence.
John and I talked several times before I could finally convince him to come out and see the house and the ongoing remodel. Over time, he told us stories about how special the house was for him all those years before; how it changed his life. He was only 28 years old when he designed it, as a “moonlighting” job. He described how he rocked his kids to sleep with his foot while he was drawing the plans, late at night. (Plans we now have, drawn with pencil on a rice paper of some kind.) John explained that the house changed his career, gave him the momentum he needed to start his own firm. He spoke very
Others look as though they will hang around, but after a brief acquaintance it's clear the two of you aren't really suited. You might have worked up a character outline, and sketched an episode or two, but the excitement has gone. The idea which looked so tempting is actually rather dull. You don't make another date. Or maybe you're just messing around while waiting for something more alluring to come along.
I shall sit with dark glasses and red lipstick
-J.A. Vasquez
I didn’t have my shark on me. Should I run back inside, up to my room and get it? Would I get a chance at him again? But I’m wearing heels!
Joe: Ideally, you will identify (but not purchase) the trailer that best suits your RVing interests and needs. Then, locate (but not purchase) the tow vehicle that best handle the size and weight of that trailer. Finally, research to determine the type of hitch you will need. In the best of all worlds, the tow vehicle will also satisfy your everyday transportation needs both while you are on the road towing your trailer, and in between RV trips as a transportation vehicle. In the real world, don’t be surprised if you have to make a number of compromises. Once these objectives are met, all you have to do is figure out how to pay for them.
We are now on the end of a dead end road. Our side only has two spots, counting us. We are fortunate to have Rich and Donna behind us. Two of the spots on the other side of the road are annual sites with friendly neighbors also. And the site one away from Rich and Donna is the same way. So we are surrounded by great people that will remain neighbors for longer than two weeks at a time.
How does it feel to see your story come to life on the stage?
So when I was released to take those vital exams, I was definitely not at my best, and confidently expected to fail them, and go back to school to retake my final year.
super fun and thrilled that he asked me to help him!!
She nodded. “I’ll try.”
Back in 1994, Showtime aired a series called Rebel Highway - ten remakes-in-name-only of juvenile delinquent/rock 'n roll exploitation films originally produced and released through Samuel Arkoff's American International Pictures in the 1950s. The series was produced by Lou Arkoff and Debra Hill. The directors - a list that included Allan Arkush, Joe Dante, Mary Lambert, Johnathan Kaplan, Ralph Bakshi (!), John Milius and William Friedkin - were each given a budget of $1.3 million dollars and a 12-day shooting schedule. They were instructed to pick a title and do whatever they wanted with it.
The Puckered Jalapeño Frozen Margarita is spicy hot yet frozen and cooling. The lemon is sour and the sugar is sweet, with a hint of bitterness (perhaps from the Jalapeno) and the salted rim.... that my friends is what we call a perfect cocktail! The perfect tasting experience hits all regions of the palate sweet, salty, sour and bitter: with a double bonus for spicy and cold. Truly the best cocktail I have ever had.
Saws are a basic building tool that are involved in just about every building project in some way or another. Knowing a little bit about them can be very helpful. Even though most saws look alike, they can be quite different.
-Plurals, tense changes, etc. count as new words
It was great to be able to do something useful. And I know all the other ladies felt the same way.
Black consumers' smartphone penetration rate this year will be slightly lower than that of whites and the U.S. population in general, according to an eMarketer report, and the gap is expected to widen in the next several years. The same pattern applies to mobile internet usage, with penetration among blacks slipping below that of whites and the total US population, after having been slightly above both at the beginning of the decade.
I panic under pressure.
Since I was out of town during the weekend of Virtual Scrapbook Night at Split Coast Stampers, I didn't get to participate in any of the challenges except the one I hosted, but now that I'm back at home, I'm trying to use them for some scrapping inspiration. This layout was inspired by Michele's Childhood Games challenge based on the game Leapfrog. We needed to use a favorite game from childhood for inspiration ( I chose Scrabble), use a minimum of 3 photos (because Leapfrog wasn’t a single player game and it wasn’t as much fun with just two people), and to tell what game inspired us (Scrabble, of course). My sister was such a good sport posing for these pictures, and now she's got me hooked on Scrabble again!
march closer
Last night was Females, Flannel, and Fire (or fun) night at the pavilion! It was such a good time! We sipped hot apple cider, roasted marshmallows and made s'mores, listened to Mrs. Olshine speak about resting in God, worshipped together, and made fruit/chocolate melts (take a banana and make an incision through the peel and into the banana, stuff it with chocolate chips, wrap in aluminum foil, and stick it in the fire. Let it sit for 5-8 minutes, take it out, and eat.). It was such a good evening!
Well, I wish there was an easy answer to this dilemma. There isn't. Sometimes you simply have to take a step away from the manuscript for a while--come back to it with the two opposing opinions in the back of your mind. A quick read through may highlight one as the better way for you to take your work... then again, it may not. Sometimes, whether or not we have the confidence to make the determination--it simply comes down to a matter of opinion.
The terms black humor is thrown around a lot these days. Originally, the term was invented by Surrealist André Breton to describe comedies where the humor was derived from cynism and skepticism. But the term has many derivatives, including black comedy. Black comedy focuses on taboo topics, in particular death, and takes a satirical look on them while maintaining a sense of seriousness. Therefore, the goal of black comedy is to cause the audience to experience laughter and discomfort at the same time. One of the most famous examples of black comedy is Stanley Kubrick’s Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb (1964), a film that found humor in such topics as nuclear warfare and the complete extinction of life on earth.
"War criminals" like George W. Bush, who was viciously betrayed by the Americans he struggled valiantly to protect have remained all but silent when it comes to Obama's complete failure. No calls for Malia and Sasha to be forced onto the front lines or war. No protests against the human rights violations our president is actually committing, not made up ones like those leveled at Bush during his admirable presidency.
And, wouldn’t you know, my new pillow combo inspired me to paint the back of those bookcases again. From coral back to blue—this time in a peacock shade of Castile by Olympic Paint. I know. It never ends.
Together, they would create something the world had never seen.
Misadventure
The traveling was as follows:
Welcome to the "It's Cold Outside" blog hop! This hop will be today, Saturday, January 7th and Sunday, January 8th. If you came here from Ashley's blog, you are on the right track! If you just happened find this, great, but you should start at Zenita's blog and hop on through!
share them with your family.
Jamar from Team Cee Lo just sang “If You Don’t Know Me By Now” and did an excellent job of it! He chose a more modern beat for it and really killed some of those notes. I totally agree with Blake that he showed a different side of himself with this one.
Wait for it.
version of Steven Spielberg you could say. He's made
If you were to ask me today, based Jacob’s area of concerns only, what grade I believe Jacob’s level of ability to complete work without any problem or need for help, I would say first. I DEMAND to know how Jacob is going to get the help and services he needs to achieve third grade level performance, as well as the ability to function as a thriving and excelling student going forward in this district. My son is entering third grade next school year, yet he cannot read a chapter book, he cannot write a complete sentence, let alone a paragraph without assistance.
Soaked in scintillating sensuous notes of saxophone
When I walked into class the following day, I wondered whether or not Jane Austen student would in fact remember to bring her pictures of Chawton and, if she did, how I would explain to her that I would not, in fact, be able to see them, much as I wished to. ‘Idiot,’ I thought. ‘Golden opportunity for a teachable moment here, and because you’re such a politically-correct chickenshit, you’ve let it slip right past.’ As I suspected, Jane Austen student did in fact bring her pictures and suggested walking to my office with me so she could share them. Now the moment had come; there was no way out, but how could I offend her when she’d gone out of her way to bring the pictures and seemed so enthusiastic about sharing them with me?
The idea is radical, right across the EU; this system can ensure that accountability and general need is met.
Under this monumental weight, the Atlas that is Joulupukki manages to attain catharsis. The latter pieces over-driven, the beats big, brutal and nasty, the record seems to therapeutically expunge itself of all emotion, culminating in a final cut that is a defiant ship lost in a storm, battered by rogue waves yet faithfully waiting for the calm. In this state of mind, devoid of all concern, there is nothing left but a meditative stasis.
So the culture was appeased!
2. The Ilf & Petrov Thesis : Once Apartheid was defeated, everything in South Africa was ok. Based on the novel "The Twelve Chairs", by the aforementioned Soviet writers, in which we find the slogan "No one can save the drowning but the drowning themselves" ("Дело помощи утопающим — дело рук самих утопающих").
Many times we get bogged down thinking about what we don’t have. Concentrating on the great things in your life will instantly boost your mood.
No, nevertheless: when you analyze it positively from a gold bug perspective, what would you say about Mr. Bernanke’s policies?
So here I am - halfway to Los Angeles for CHA with credit cards in hand ready for some major retail therapy for the store, no piccies today, as I am on the computer in the hotel business centre, it's really not worth paying out for 24hrs internet access when I am off again early in the morning lol.
Thursday, January 27th, marked the birth of my grandmother, Tina Mae Martin Sifers... and no... that isn't pronounced TEENA... that is a LONG I sound... TIIIINA Mae. Or, if you were an "old timer" you would have said "Tiny Mae". She was born in 1910, and a few weeks after her 80th birthday she passed away. And I am pretty sure not a day goes by that I don't think of her in some way.
This can be combined in the preserved tomato sauce (one cup of tomato sauce or as per taste can be used)
Matthew: Mother, you’re right that feelings of love for someone carry light to that person, but you’re also right in thinking there may be more to it. So, even though it’s not necessary that you understand the “sending” process for it to be effective, I’ll explain how it works.
*long pause* Okay so I know I haven't blogged in a very long time and I'm sorry for that life was kind of kicking my ass. But at the moment I feel I need to get back into it so I can get some of the stuff I've been thinking off of my chest. A sort of cleansing if you will. NOW I also want to say, HOW THE FUCK DO I HAVE 25 FOLLOWERS?!??! When I blogged last I had like, 15! Could it be that my awesome was flowing even whilst I was away? YESSSS It must be.
He did not always attend meals in the dining room as his tastes ran to those of an eight year old. This caused me to have to hunt him down. He was almost always in his room where he watched dvds of tv programs like The Three Stooges, black and white Superman shows, and cartoons. Tom and Jerry being his fav.
Randy acknowledges that working on his manuscript is difficult. He relies on technology -- a screen reader so he can see what is on the screen and a Morse code to input the data to the computer. He even has a demonstration on YouTube, just type his name to find it.
I never want to come across as unprofessional but I conceded that this is probably the last week ever in which to wear a nice summer weight dress and caved in. So I took several measures to tone it down for work. Firstly I wore it with flats and threw a sharp blazer over it. Secondly, though I haven't shown it in these photos (as strangely it's too hot!), to keep things covered up even more, as well as keep me protected from the rampant air conditioning in the office, I also wore a cropped, long sleeved, fine knit, grey cardigan and opaque tights all day. I swear I looked positively dowdy! However after office hours, taking the tights and cardigan off and adding heels completely changes the look. Ready for martinis!
Farmer chose to leave the panel responsible for monitoring the functioning of the work capability assessment (WCA), the new fitness-for-work test that determines who is eligible for sickness benefits, frustrated that the government was not paying attention to the growing chorus of alarm over the reliability of the test.
Your heart misleads you. That’s what my friends and family say. But I love Noah. And he loves me. We met and fell in love in the sleepy farming community of Meadowview, while we rode our horses together through the grassy fields and in those moments in each other’s arms. It should be ROSE & NOAH forever, easy. But it won’t be. Because he’s Amish. And I’m not.
On the back of a whisper.
The rest of the chapter we discussed. The illustrations in the text are great, but I wanted to find or rig a container similar to what is pictured in the book with the connected water columns and the piston. They got a basic understanding of the concept but I extended it to remind them that what they gain in strength they have to make up in distance, just like other simple machines. A simulation or demonstration would have gone a long way here.
But what I want to share with you is a comment by a girl who came up to me afterwards. Now, this will only make sense to you if you have read Wasted, but this is what she said:
Crap. I was pretty sure that Rehnquist wasn't one anymore, and then there was that lady who was just confirmed a few months ago- her name sounds something like Soderburg, but I know he's a director...
I have no ground as everywhere is paved, so apart from a 30 square foot raised brick bed I had made on a concrete slab, everything else I have to grow in pots. And I move the pots around if I think the plants will be happier with more / less shade, cover, etc. I painted the concrete floor, walls and planter box with a special white paint that reflects the heat – it is manufactured in Ipoh and they deliver. This means I can walk on the floor and not burn my feet, the plants are cooler, and the house is cooler.
The matter of the email evidence, its alleged disappearance and subsequent retrieval, is clearly material, substantial and relevant to the case.
The Canadian Festival of Spoken Word is Canada’s largest poetry spectacle focused on spoken word. Each fall, poets travel from across the country to meet in a different city every year for a poetic battle royale. The first time it was held in 2004 in Ottawa, the event was called the Canadian Spoken Wordlympics and hosted eight teams from five cities. By the following year it had become CFSW and was already adding new communities. This past year, CFSW 2011 Toronto hosted 20 teams from 17 communities, spanning the full expanse of our large and diverse country.
What they do not mention here is a single woman. She went in there to build a “family” knowing full well that there would never be a father in the picture. She has 10 sons who will never have a father. It is most heinous of it all. She knew 100% they wouldn’t have a male role model.
I devoured it speedily, really enjoying this endearing young lady and her world populated with amusing characters, and sprinkled with snippets of absolutely typical Botswana life!
Freddie Mac FIASCOES!
“He has made everything beautiful in its time. He has also set eternity in the human heart; yet no one can fathom what God has done from beginning to end. I know that there is nothing better for people than to be happy and to do good while they live.”
Keep in mind that this is a government that has promised economy diversification in their 7 Pillars of Development Plan, aka 2010 Manifesto. To date we have seen few signs of any real thrust at diversification…and we all know why, to diversify, you need to take the self same oil money and invest it into other areas…..but if that oil money being poured into projects to line the pockets of friends and cronies and to fund projects that are normally funded off international loans, then you aint have too much $$$$ remaining to invest, eh?
These armies would be easy to make, using various Chinese/East Asian figures. I don't think you can get a Pulgasari miniature or, at least, not one at a scale suitable for the tabletop but any Godzilla-style monster toy would work nicely. You'd probably have to scratch-build the artillery though.
They also have downloads for windows and Mac's..and possibly Androids? I can't really answer that last one because I didn't recognize the little icon and don't know what it belongs to..but check it out if you are having problems with Firefox working with your form filler, like I did.
"The indigenous California Indians used this poppy as both a source of food and medicine. Several groups boiled the plant, or roasted it on host stones, to eat as a green. The Costanoan Indians rubbed a decoction of the flowers in the hair to kill lice; the Indians of Mendocino County used a poultice of fresh root for toothaches and a topically applied extract for headaches and sores; and Cahuilla women used the pollen as a cosmetic and the whole plant as a sedative for babies. Medicinally, California poppy is a plant with sedative, analgesic and antispastic activities, but unlike the alkaloids of the opium poppy, it does not seem to induce tolerance and dependence. It is touted by some for the treatment of anxiety and to induce sleep in patients affected
Crepsley then digs up Darren's grave when they are attacked by Murlough. Murlough wants to capture Darren and bring him to Tiny. Crepsley eventually manages to lose Murlough and return to the Cirque. Darren meets and becomes friends with Evra Von (Patrick Fugit) the snake boy and Rebecca (Jessica Carlson), a girl with a monkey tail, and the three quickly become friends from the work they do together, while being spied on by Little People, people that Mr Tiny had brought back from the dead in return that they would become his servants, who were told by Mr Tiny to follow Darren and report back unusual things to Mr Tiny. Throught this, Mr Tiny finds out about Darren refusing to drink blood so therefore, he is very weak because being a vampire, you need to drink blood or die. As Steve is contemplating suicide, Mr. Tiny stops him and offers him a chance to become a Vampaneze like Murlough. Tiny has several Vampaneze go to the Cirque to kidnap Darren. As Darren hasn't fed yet he doesn't have any powers and is forced to run while the rest of the Cirque tries to stop them. In the end they kidnap Rebecca and have Evra tell Darren to go home.
The 'Fired From Life' 7" was released in 1992 on Pot Pie Recrds, a small local label. The only other release I know of is the Chicken 7" posted here before.
I'm very relieved. And we're all very excited for another little bundle of joy ... and energy, and responsibility :) to join our family. This little guy has no idea what he's in for!
GST
Jeni B Bleu Vibez
Willy Appelman and the Thunderbirds-4-Life
Not!!
Melted sugar cookie dough
I do my best to get out of the way!
You don’t need to pre-heat the oven. just use the direct heat from the Electric Salamander. If you think that the air density inside the oven is to high, you can let the door open while cooking.
6) Its illegal.
Marijuana possession policies.
Honestly I wish there was no such thing as schools as we know them, I don't believe teaching should be a profession....There I said it, yes my family has several teachers in it and probably wouldn't understand why I would say such a thing.
Ok....let me just start by telling you that this project wouldn't leave me alone! No kidding! I've had this one in my head for about a week and I finally gave in and put it all together....and I'm SO glad I did. It just makes me happy. :-) I love Gerber Daisies and they seemed like the perfect addition to this project. I'm so excited to share it with you!
The title for this photo has a double meaning.
As for the other lovely root veggies, I've been a fan of the easy and quick: peel, cut into thin slices and bake with olive oil, parsley and a bit of salt/pepper/parmesan cheese in the oven. I also include a few cloves of peeled garlic for added flavor (and hey! garlic is good for immunity against those annoying late-season colds!!) Whether you're in Paris or not, try to find celery root before the end of winter and use it up. You will not be disappointed!
The formula was flawless (another reason why I think it might not be a neon! lol). Not streaky, patchy, or sheer. Completely easily opaque in 2 coats. It was a perfect consistency, and I don't think this needs to be layered over white at all as some neons do to reach their full potential.
So I thought it fitting that my first DT card for my blog should be a giraffe. This little Giraffe and sentiment are a new release, and of course I had to have both! Her (dubbed "Georgette" by me) eyes and short little legs just crack me up. I am a giraffe lover, if that is news to you, and have been collecting all sorts of them since my first year in college -- a very looooong time ago!
ha ha wow conan yoo shoor ar a lot bigger in persun then yoo ar on televizhun!!! all rite now first i wood like to let evrywun no abowt an event wot my frend twinkie is running its the global animal blogging event event!!!
'Hello?' I said back into the phone.
Today is another look at "Bright Side", and we have some seriously gorgeous layouts today! We also have a little video on the bottom showcasing our Lawn Trimmings cord and fun ways to dye it!
Then add the fact that Swansea is also home to major players in the social / 'affordable' housing sector, some of which I have dealt with in the past, such as The Coastal Housing Group, which seems to be both a social housing provider and and a property developer; plus the Gwalia group, which housed the gang of English paedophiles jailed last year. All of which I suggest makes the Swansea conurbation something of a magnet for dossers and those looking for somewhere to live at someone else's expense.
I was running up a flight of stairways, he was right behind me. A cool breeze blew, swishing the green ultra flare skirt I was wearing up as I ran up the stairs. The breeze tasted salty.
